Illinois, session 104th, SB19.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 3. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 18-127 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/18-127)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 18-127)7    Sec. 18-127. Retirement annuity - suspension on 8reemployment. 9    (a) A participant receiving a retirement annuity who is 10regularly employed for compensation by an employer other than 11a county, in any capacity, shall have his or her retirement 12annuity payments suspended during such employment. Upon 13termination of such employment, retirement annuity payments at 14the previous rate shall be resumed.15    If such a participant resumes service as a judge, he or she 16shall receive credit for any additional service. Upon 17subsequent retirement, his or her retirement annuity shall be 18the amount previously granted, plus the amount earned by the 19additional judicial service under the provisions in effect 20during the period of such additional service. However, if the 21participant was receiving the maximum rate of annuity at the 22time of re-employment, he or she may elect, in a written 23direction filed with the board, not to receive any additional   SB0019- 2 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1service credit during the period of re-employment. In such 2case, contributions shall not be required during the period of 3re-employment. Any such election shall be irrevocable.4    (b) Beginning January 1, 1991, any participant receiving a 5retirement annuity who accepts temporary employment from an 6employer other than a county for a period not exceeding 75 7working days in any calendar year shall not be deemed to be 8regularly employed for compensation or to have resumed service 9as a judge for the purposes of this Article. A day shall be 10considered a working day if the annuitant performs on it any of 11his duties under the temporary employment agreement.12    (c) Except as provided in subsection (a), beginning 13January 1, 1993, retirement annuities shall not be subject to 14suspension upon resumption of employment for an employer, and 15any retirement annuity that is then so suspended shall be 16reinstated on that date.17    (d) The changes made in this Section by this amendatory 18Act of 1993 shall apply to judges no longer in service on its 19effective date, as well as to judges serving on or after that 20date.21    (e) A participant receiving a retirement annuity under 22this Article who serves as a part-time employee in any of the 23following positions: Legislative Inspector General, Special 24Legislative Inspector General, employee of the Office of the 25Legislative Inspector General, Executive Director of the 26Legislative Ethics Commission, or staff of the Legislative   SB0019- 3 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1Ethics Commission, or as a full-time member of the Prisoner 2Review Board, but has not elected to participate in the 3Article 14 System with respect to that service, shall not be 4deemed to be regularly employed for compensation by an 5employer other than a county, nor to have resumed service as a 6judge, on the basis of that service, and the retirement 7annuity payments and other benefits of that person under this 8Code shall not be suspended, diminished, or otherwise impaired 9solely as a consequence of that service. This subsection (e) 10applies without regard to whether the person is in service as a 11judge under this Article on or after the effective date of this 12amendatory Act of the 93rd General Assembly. In this 13subsection, a "part-time employee" is a person who is not 14required to work at least 35 hours per week. 15    (f) A participant receiving a retirement annuity under 16this Article who has made an election under Section 1-123 and 17who is serving either as legal counsel in the Office of the 18Governor or as Chief Deputy Attorney General shall not be 19deemed to be regularly employed for compensation by an 20employer other than a county, nor to have resumed service as a 21judge, on the basis of that service, and the retirement 22annuity payments and other benefits of that person under this 23Code shall not be suspended, diminished, or otherwise impaired 24solely as a consequence of that service. This subsection (f) 25applies without regard to whether the person is in service as a 26judge under this Article on or after the effective date of this   SB0019- 4 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1amendatory Act of the 93rd General Assembly. 2    (g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 3if a person who first becomes a participant under this System 4on or after January 1, 2011 (the effective date of this 5amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly) is receiving a 6retirement annuity under this Article and becomes a member or 7participant under this Article or any other Article of this 8Code and is employed on a full-time basis, then the person's 9retirement annuity under this System shall be suspended during 10that employment. Upon termination of that employment, the 11person's retirement annuity shall resume and, if appropriate, 12be recalculated under the applicable provisions of this 13Article.14(Source: P.A. 96-889, eff. 1-1-11; 96-1490, eff. 1-1-11.) 15    Section 5. The Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act 16is amended by changing Sections 4.5 and 5 as follows: 17    (725 ILCS 120/4.5)18    Sec. 4.5. Procedures to implement the rights of crime 19victims. To afford crime victims their rights, law 20enforcement, prosecutors, judges, and corrections will provide 21information, as appropriate, of the following procedures:22    (a) At the request of the crime victim, law enforcement 23authorities investigating the case shall provide notice of the 24status of the investigation, except where the State's Attorney   SB0019- 5 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1determines that disclosure of such information would 2unreasonably interfere with the investigation, until such time 3as the alleged assailant is apprehended or the investigation 4is closed.5    (a-5) When law enforcement authorities reopen a closed 6case to resume investigating, they shall provide notice of the 7reopening of the case, except where the State's Attorney 8determines that disclosure of such information would 9unreasonably interfere with the investigation. 10    (a-6) The Prisoner Review Board shall publish on its 11official public website and provide to registered victims 12information regarding how to submit a victim impact statement. 13The Prisoner Review Board shall consider victim impact 14statements from any registered victims. Any registered victim, 15including a person who has had a final, plenary, or 16non-emergency order of protection granted under Article 112A 17of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 or under the Illinois 18Domestic Violence Act of 1986, may present victim statements 19that the Prisoner Review Board shall consider in its 20deliberations. 21    (b) The office of the State's Attorney:22        (1) shall provide notice of the filing of an 23    information, the return of an indictment, or the filing of 24    a petition to adjudicate a minor as a delinquent for a 25    violent crime;26        (2) shall provide timely notice of the date, time, and   SB0019- 6 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    place of court proceedings; of any change in the date, 2    time, and place of court proceedings; and of any 3    cancellation of court proceedings. Notice shall be 4    provided in sufficient time, wherever possible, for the 5    victim to make arrangements to attend or to prevent an 6    unnecessary appearance at court proceedings;7        (3) or victim advocate personnel shall provide 8    information of social services and financial assistance 9    available for victims of crime, including information of 10    how to apply for these services and assistance;11        (3.5) or victim advocate personnel shall provide 12    information about available victim services, including 13    referrals to programs, counselors, and agencies that 14    assist a victim to deal with trauma, loss, and grief; 15        (4) shall assist in having any stolen or other 16    personal property held by law enforcement authorities for 17    evidentiary or other purposes returned as expeditiously as 18    possible, pursuant to the procedures set out in Section 19    115-9 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963;20        (5) or victim advocate personnel shall provide 21    appropriate employer intercession services to ensure that 22    employers of victims will cooperate with the criminal 23    justice system in order to minimize an employee's loss of 24    pay and other benefits resulting from court appearances;25        (6) shall provide, whenever possible, a secure waiting 26    area during court proceedings that does not require   SB0019- 7 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    victims to be in close proximity to defendants or 2    juveniles accused of a violent crime, and their families 3    and friends;4        (7) shall provide notice to the crime victim of the 5    right to have a translator present at all court 6    proceedings and, in compliance with the federal Americans 7    with Disabilities Act of 1990, the right to communications 8    access through a sign language interpreter or by other 9    means;10        (8) (blank);11        (8.5) shall inform the victim of the right to be 12    present at all court proceedings, unless the victim is to 13    testify and the court determines that the victim's 14    testimony would be materially affected if the victim hears 15    other testimony at trial; 16        (9) shall inform the victim of the right to have 17    present at all court proceedings, subject to the rules of 18    evidence and confidentiality, an advocate and other 19    support person of the victim's choice; 20        (9.3) shall inform the victim of the right to retain 21    an attorney, at the victim's own expense, who, upon 22    written notice filed with the clerk of the court and 23    State's Attorney, is to receive copies of all notices, 24    motions, and court orders filed thereafter in the case, in 25    the same manner as if the victim were a named party in the 26    case;  SB0019- 8 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1        (9.5) shall inform the victim of (A) the victim's 2    right under Section 6 of this Act to make a statement at 3    the sentencing hearing; (B) the right of the victim's 4    spouse, guardian, parent, grandparent, and other immediate 5    family and household members under Section 6 of this Act 6    to present a statement at sentencing; and (C) if a 7    presentence report is to be prepared, the right of the 8    victim's spouse, guardian, parent, grandparent, and other 9    immediate family and household members to submit 10    information to the preparer of the presentence report 11    about the effect the offense has had on the victim and the 12    person;13        (10) at the sentencing shall make a good faith attempt 14    to explain the minimum amount of time during which the 15    defendant may actually be physically imprisoned. The 16    Office of the State's Attorney shall further notify the 17    crime victim of the right to request from the Prisoner 18    Review Board or Department of Juvenile Justice information 19    concerning the release of the defendant;20        (11) shall request restitution at sentencing and as 21    part of a plea agreement if the victim requests 22    restitution;23        (12) shall, upon the court entering a verdict of not 24    guilty by reason of insanity, inform the victim of the 25    notification services available from the Department of 26    Human Services, including the statewide telephone number,   SB0019- 9 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    under subparagraph (d)(2) of this Section; 2        (13) shall provide notice within a reasonable time 3    after receipt of notice from the custodian, of the release 4    of the defendant on pretrial release or personal 5    recognizance or the release from detention of a minor who 6    has been detained;7        (14) shall explain in nontechnical language the 8    details of any plea or verdict of a defendant, or any 9    adjudication of a juvenile as a delinquent;10        (15) shall make all reasonable efforts to consult with 11    the crime victim before the Office of the State's Attorney 12    makes an offer of a plea bargain to the defendant or enters 13    into negotiations with the defendant concerning a possible 14    plea agreement, and shall consider the written statement, 15    if prepared prior to entering into a plea agreement. The 16    right to consult with the prosecutor does not include the 17    right to veto a plea agreement or to insist the case go to 18    trial. If the State's Attorney has not consulted with the 19    victim prior to making an offer or entering into plea 20    negotiations with the defendant, the Office of the State's 21    Attorney shall notify the victim of the offer or the 22    negotiations within 2 business days and confer with the 23    victim;24        (16) shall provide notice of the ultimate disposition 25    of the cases arising from an indictment or an information, 26    or a petition to have a juvenile adjudicated as a   SB0019- 10 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    delinquent for a violent crime;2        (17) shall provide notice of any appeal taken by the 3    defendant and information on how to contact the 4    appropriate agency handling the appeal, and how to request 5    notice of any hearing, oral argument, or decision of an 6    appellate court;7        (18) shall provide timely notice of any request for 8    post-conviction review filed by the defendant under 9    Article 122 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963, and 10    of the date, time and place of any hearing concerning the 11    petition. Whenever possible, notice of the hearing shall 12    be given within 48 hours of the court's scheduling of the 13    hearing;14        (19) shall forward a copy of any statement presented 15    under Section 6 to the Prisoner Review Board or Department 16    of Juvenile Justice to be considered in making a 17    determination under Section 3-2.5-85 or subsection (b) of 18    Section 3-3-8 of the Unified Code of Corrections;19        (20) shall, within a reasonable time, offer to meet 20    with the crime victim regarding the decision of the 21    State's Attorney not to charge an offense, and shall meet 22    with the victim, if the victim agrees. The victim has a 23    right to have an attorney, advocate, and other support 24    person of the victim's choice attend this meeting with the 25    victim; and26        (21) shall give the crime victim timely notice of any   SB0019- 11 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    decision not to pursue charges and consider the safety of 2    the victim when deciding how to give such notice. 3    (c) The court shall ensure that the rights of the victim 4are afforded. 5    (c-5) The following procedures shall be followed to afford 6victims the rights guaranteed by Article I, Section 8.1 of the 7Illinois Constitution:8        (1) Written notice. A victim may complete a written 9    notice of intent to assert rights on a form prepared by the 10    Office of the Attorney General and provided to the victim 11    by the State's Attorney. The victim may at any time 12    provide a revised written notice to the State's Attorney. 13    The State's Attorney shall file the written notice with 14    the court. At the beginning of any court proceeding in 15    which the right of a victim may be at issue, the court and 16    prosecutor shall review the written notice to determine 17    whether the victim has asserted the right that may be at 18    issue.19        (2) Victim's retained attorney. A victim's attorney 20    shall file an entry of appearance limited to assertion of 21    the victim's rights. Upon the filing of the entry of 22    appearance and service on the State's Attorney and the 23    defendant, the attorney is to receive copies of all 24    notices, motions and court orders filed thereafter in the 25    case.26        (3) Standing. The victim has standing to assert the   SB0019- 12 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    rights enumerated in subsection (a) of Article I, Section 2    8.1 of the Illinois Constitution and the statutory rights 3    under Section 4 of this Act in any court exercising 4    jurisdiction over the criminal case. The prosecuting 5    attorney, a victim, or the victim's retained attorney may 6    assert the victim's rights. The defendant in the criminal 7    case has no standing to assert a right of the victim in any 8    court proceeding, including on appeal.9        (4) Assertion of and enforcement of rights.10            (A) The prosecuting attorney shall assert a 11        victim's right or request enforcement of a right by 12        filing a motion or by orally asserting the right or 13        requesting enforcement in open court in the criminal 14        case outside the presence of the jury. The prosecuting 15        attorney shall consult with the victim and the 16        victim's attorney regarding the assertion or 17        enforcement of a right. If the prosecuting attorney 18        decides not to assert or enforce a victim's right, the 19        prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim or the 20        victim's attorney in sufficient time to allow the 21        victim or the victim's attorney to assert the right or 22        to seek enforcement of a right.23            (B) If the prosecuting attorney elects not to 24        assert a victim's right or to seek enforcement of a 25        right, the victim or the victim's attorney may assert 26        the victim's right or request enforcement of a right   SB0019- 13 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1        by filing a motion or by orally asserting the right or 2        requesting enforcement in open court in the criminal 3        case outside the presence of the jury.4            (C) If the prosecuting attorney asserts a victim's 5        right or seeks enforcement of a right, unless the 6        prosecuting attorney objects or the trial court does 7        not allow it, the victim or the victim's attorney may 8        be heard regarding the prosecuting attorney's motion 9        or may file a simultaneous motion to assert or request 10        enforcement of the victim's right. If the victim or 11        the victim's attorney was not allowed to be heard at 12        the hearing regarding the prosecuting attorney's 13        motion, and the court denies the prosecuting 14        attorney's assertion of the right or denies the 15        request for enforcement of a right, the victim or 16        victim's attorney may file a motion to assert the 17        victim's right or to request enforcement of the right 18        within 10 days of the court's ruling. The motion need 19        not demonstrate the grounds for a motion for 20        reconsideration. The court shall rule on the merits of 21        the motion.22            (D) The court shall take up and decide any motion 23        or request asserting or seeking enforcement of a 24        victim's right without delay, unless a specific time 25        period is specified by law or court rule. The reasons 26        for any decision denying the motion or request shall   SB0019- 14 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1        be clearly stated on the record.2            (E) No later than January 1, 2023, the Office of 3        the Attorney General shall: 4                (i) designate an administrative authority 5            within the Office of the Attorney General to 6            receive and investigate complaints relating to the 7            provision or violation of the rights of a crime 8            victim as described in Article I, Section 8.1 of 9            the Illinois Constitution and in this Act;10                (ii) create and administer a course of 11            training for employees and offices of the State of 12            Illinois that fail to comply with provisions of 13            Illinois law pertaining to the treatment of crime 14            victims as described in Article I, Section 8.1 of 15            the Illinois Constitution and in this Act as 16            required by the court under Section 5 of this Act; 17            and18                (iii) have the authority to make 19            recommendations to employees and offices of the 20            State of Illinois to respond more effectively to 21            the needs of crime victims, including regarding 22            the violation of the rights of a crime victim.23            (F) Crime victims' rights may also be asserted by 24        filing a complaint for mandamus, injunctive, or 25        declaratory relief in the jurisdiction in which the 26        victim's right is being violated or where the crime is   SB0019- 15 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1        being prosecuted. For complaints or motions filed by 2        or on behalf of the victim, the clerk of court shall 3        waive filing fees that would otherwise be owed by the 4        victim for any court filing with the purpose of 5        enforcing crime victims' rights. If the court denies 6        the relief sought by the victim, the reasons for the 7        denial shall be clearly stated on the record in the 8        transcript of the proceedings, in a written opinion, 9        or in the docket entry, and the victim may appeal the 10        circuit court's decision to the appellate court. The 11        court shall issue prompt rulings regarding victims' 12        rights. Proceedings seeking to enforce victims' rights 13        shall not be stayed or subject to unreasonable delay 14        via continuances. 15        (5) Violation of rights and remedies. 16            (A) If the court determines that a victim's right 17        has been violated, the court shall determine the 18        appropriate remedy for the violation of the victim's 19        right by hearing from the victim and the parties, 20        considering all factors relevant to the issue, and 21        then awarding appropriate relief to the victim.22            (A-5) Consideration of an issue of a substantive 23        nature or an issue that implicates the constitutional 24        or statutory right of a victim at a court proceeding 25        labeled as a status hearing shall constitute a per se 26        violation of a victim's right.   SB0019- 16 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1            (B) The appropriate remedy shall include only 2        actions necessary to provide the victim the right to 3        which the victim was entitled. Remedies may include, 4        but are not limited to: injunctive relief requiring 5        the victim's right to be afforded; declaratory 6        judgment recognizing or clarifying the victim's 7        rights; a writ of mandamus; and may include reopening 8        previously held proceedings; however, in no event 9        shall the court vacate a conviction. Any remedy shall 10        be tailored to provide the victim an appropriate 11        remedy without violating any constitutional right of 12        the defendant. In no event shall the appropriate 13        remedy to the victim be a new trial or damages.14        The court shall impose a mandatory training course 15    provided by the Attorney General for the employee under 16    item (ii) of subparagraph (E) of paragraph (4), which must 17    be successfully completed within 6 months of the entry of 18    the court order.19        This paragraph (5) takes effect January 2, 2023.20        (6) Right to be heard. Whenever a victim has the right 21    to be heard, the court shall allow the victim to exercise 22    the right in any reasonable manner the victim chooses.23        (7) Right to attend trial. A party must file a written 24    motion to exclude a victim from trial at least 60 days 25    prior to the date set for trial. The motion must state with 26    specificity the reason exclusion is necessary to protect a   SB0019- 17 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    constitutional right of the party, and must contain an 2    offer of proof. The court shall rule on the motion within 3    30 days. If the motion is granted, the court shall set 4    forth on the record the facts that support its finding 5    that the victim's testimony will be materially affected if 6    the victim hears other testimony at trial.7        (8) Right to have advocate and support person present 8    at court proceedings.9            (A) A party who intends to call an advocate as a 10        witness at trial must seek permission of the court 11        before the subpoena is issued. The party must file a 12        written motion at least 90 days before trial that sets 13        forth specifically the issues on which the advocate's 14        testimony is sought and an offer of proof regarding 15        (i) the content of the anticipated testimony of the 16        advocate; and (ii) the relevance, admissibility, and 17        materiality of the anticipated testimony. The court 18        shall consider the motion and make findings within 30 19        days of the filing of the motion. If the court finds by 20        a preponderance of the evidence that: (i) the 21        anticipated testimony is not protected by an absolute 22        privilege; and (ii) the anticipated testimony contains 23        relevant, admissible, and material evidence that is 24        not available through other witnesses or evidence, the 25        court shall issue a subpoena requiring the advocate to 26        appear to testify at an in camera hearing. The   SB0019- 18 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1        prosecuting attorney and the victim shall have 15 days 2        to seek appellate review before the advocate is 3        required to testify at an ex parte in camera 4        proceeding. 5            The prosecuting attorney, the victim, and the 6        advocate's attorney shall be allowed to be present at 7        the ex parte in camera proceeding. If, after 8        conducting the ex parte in camera hearing, the court 9        determines that due process requires any testimony 10        regarding confidential or privileged information or 11        communications, the court shall provide to the 12        prosecuting attorney, the victim, and the advocate's 13        attorney a written memorandum on the substance of the 14        advocate's testimony. The prosecuting attorney, the 15        victim, and the advocate's attorney shall have 15 days 16        to seek appellate review before a subpoena may be 17        issued for the advocate to testify at trial. The 18        presence of the prosecuting attorney at the ex parte 19        in camera proceeding does not make the substance of 20        the advocate's testimony that the court has ruled 21        inadmissible subject to discovery.22            (B) If a victim has asserted the right to have a 23        support person present at the court proceedings, the 24        victim shall provide the name of the person the victim 25        has chosen to be the victim's support person to the 26        prosecuting attorney, within 60 days of trial. The   SB0019- 19 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1        prosecuting attorney shall provide the name to the 2        defendant. If the defendant intends to call the 3        support person as a witness at trial, the defendant 4        must seek permission of the court before a subpoena is 5        issued. The defendant must file a written motion at 6        least 45 days prior to trial that sets forth 7        specifically the issues on which the support person 8        will testify and an offer of proof regarding: (i) the 9        content of the anticipated testimony of the support 10        person; and (ii) the relevance, admissibility, and 11        materiality of the anticipated testimony.12            If the prosecuting attorney intends to call the 13        support person as a witness during the State's 14        case-in-chief, the prosecuting attorney shall inform 15        the court of this intent in the response to the 16        defendant's written motion. The victim may choose a 17        different person to be the victim's support person. 18        The court may allow the defendant to inquire about 19        matters outside the scope of the direct examination 20        during cross-examination. If the court allows the 21        defendant to do so, the support person shall be 22        allowed to remain in the courtroom after the support 23        person has testified. A defendant who fails to 24        question the support person about matters outside the 25        scope of direct examination during the State's 26        case-in-chief waives the right to challenge the   SB0019- 20 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1        presence of the support person on appeal. The court 2        shall allow the support person to testify if called as 3        a witness in the defendant's case-in-chief or the 4        State's rebuttal.5            If the court does not allow the defendant to 6        inquire about matters outside the scope of the direct 7        examination, the support person shall be allowed to 8        remain in the courtroom after the support person has 9        been called by the defendant or the defendant has 10        rested. The court shall allow the support person to 11        testify in the State's rebuttal.12            If the prosecuting attorney does not intend to 13        call the support person in the State's case-in-chief, 14        the court shall verify with the support person whether 15        the support person, if called as a witness, would 16        testify as set forth in the offer of proof. If the 17        court finds that the support person would testify as 18        set forth in the offer of proof, the court shall rule 19        on the relevance, materiality, and admissibility of 20        the anticipated testimony. If the court rules the 21        anticipated testimony is admissible, the court shall 22        issue the subpoena. The support person may remain in 23        the courtroom after the support person testifies and 24        shall be allowed to testify in rebuttal.25            If the court excludes the victim's support person 26        during the State's case-in-chief, the victim shall be   SB0019- 21 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1        allowed to choose another support person to be present 2        in court. 3            If the victim fails to designate a support person 4        within 60 days of trial and the defendant has 5        subpoenaed the support person to testify at trial, the 6        court may exclude the support person from the trial 7        until the support person testifies. If the court 8        excludes the support person the victim may choose 9        another person as a support person. 10        (9) Right to notice and hearing before disclosure of 11    confidential or privileged information or records.12            (A) A defendant who seeks to subpoena testimony or 13        records of or concerning the victim that are 14        confidential or privileged by law must seek permission 15        of the court before the subpoena is issued. The 16        defendant must file a written motion and an offer of 17        proof regarding the relevance, admissibility and 18        materiality of the testimony or records. If the court 19        finds by a preponderance of the evidence that:20                (i) the testimony or records are not protected 21            by an absolute privilege and22                (ii) the testimony or records contain 23            relevant, admissible, and material evidence that 24            is not available through other witnesses or 25            evidence, the court shall issue a subpoena 26            requiring the witness to appear in camera or a   SB0019- 22 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1            sealed copy of the records be delivered to the 2            court to be reviewed in camera. If, after 3            conducting an in camera review of the witness 4            statement or records, the court determines that 5            due process requires disclosure of any potential 6            testimony or any portion of the records, the court 7            shall provide copies of the records that it 8            intends to disclose to the prosecuting attorney 9            and the victim. The prosecuting attorney and the 10            victim shall have 30 days to seek appellate review 11            before the records are disclosed to the defendant, 12            used in any court proceeding, or disclosed to 13            anyone or in any way that would subject the 14            testimony or records to public review. The 15            disclosure of copies of any portion of the 16            testimony or records to the prosecuting attorney 17            under this Section does not make the records 18            subject to discovery or required to be provided to 19            the defendant.20            (B) A prosecuting attorney who seeks to subpoena 21        information or records concerning the victim that are 22        confidential or privileged by law must first request 23        the written consent of the crime victim. If the victim 24        does not provide such written consent, including where 25        necessary the appropriate signed document required for 26        waiving privilege, the prosecuting attorney must serve   SB0019- 23 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1        the subpoena at least 21 days prior to the date a 2        response or appearance is required to allow the 3        subject of the subpoena time to file a motion to quash 4        or request a hearing. The prosecuting attorney must 5        also send a written notice to the victim at least 21 6        days prior to the response date to allow the victim to 7        file a motion or request a hearing. The notice to the 8        victim shall inform the victim (i) that a subpoena has 9        been issued for confidential information or records 10        concerning the victim, (ii) that the victim has the 11        right to request a hearing prior to the response date 12        of the subpoena, and (iii) how to request the hearing. 13        The notice to the victim shall also include a copy of 14        the subpoena. If requested, a hearing regarding the 15        subpoena shall occur before information or records are 16        provided to the prosecuting attorney. 17        (10) Right to notice of court proceedings. If the 18    victim is not present at a court proceeding in which a 19    right of the victim is at issue, the court shall ask the 20    prosecuting attorney whether the victim was notified of 21    the time, place, and purpose of the court proceeding and 22    that the victim had a right to be heard at the court 23    proceeding. If the court determines that timely notice was 24    not given or that the victim was not adequately informed 25    of the nature of the court proceeding, the court shall not 26    rule on any substantive issues, accept a plea, or impose a   SB0019- 24 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    sentence and shall continue the hearing for the time 2    necessary to notify the victim of the time, place and 3    nature of the court proceeding. The time between court 4    proceedings shall not be attributable to the State under 5    Section 103-5 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963.6        (11) Right to timely disposition of the case. A victim 7    has the right to timely disposition of the case so as to 8    minimize the stress, cost, and inconvenience resulting 9    from the victim's involvement in the case. Before ruling 10    on a motion to continue trial or other court proceeding, 11    the court shall inquire into the circumstances for the 12    request for the delay and, if the victim has provided 13    written notice of the assertion of the right to a timely 14    disposition, and whether the victim objects to the delay. 15    If the victim objects, the prosecutor shall inform the 16    court of the victim's objections. If the prosecutor has 17    not conferred with the victim about the continuance, the 18    prosecutor shall inform the court of the attempts to 19    confer. If the court finds the attempts of the prosecutor 20    to confer with the victim were inadequate to protect the 21    victim's right to be heard, the court shall give the 22    prosecutor at least 3 but not more than 5 business days to 23    confer with the victim. In ruling on a motion to continue, 24    the court shall consider the reasons for the requested 25    continuance, the number and length of continuances that 26    have been granted, the victim's objections and procedures   SB0019- 25 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    to avoid further delays. If a continuance is granted over 2    the victim's objection, the court shall specify on the 3    record the reasons for the continuance and the procedures 4    that have been or will be taken to avoid further delays.5        (12) Right to Restitution.6            (A) If the victim has asserted the right to 7        restitution and the amount of restitution is known at 8        the time of sentencing, the court shall enter the 9        judgment of restitution at the time of sentencing. 10            (B) If the victim has asserted the right to 11        restitution and the amount of restitution is not known 12        at the time of sentencing, the prosecutor shall, 13        within 5 days after sentencing, notify the victim what 14        information and documentation related to restitution 15        is needed and that the information and documentation 16        must be provided to the prosecutor within 45 days 17        after sentencing. Failure to timely provide 18        information and documentation related to restitution 19        shall be deemed a waiver of the right to restitution. 20        The prosecutor shall file and serve within 60 days 21        after sentencing a proposed judgment for restitution 22        and a notice that includes information concerning the 23        identity of any victims or other persons seeking 24        restitution, whether any victim or other person 25        expressly declines restitution, the nature and amount 26        of any damages together with any supporting   SB0019- 26 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1        documentation, a restitution amount recommendation, 2        and the names of any co-defendants and their case 3        numbers. Within 30 days after receipt of the proposed 4        judgment for restitution, the defendant shall file any 5        objection to the proposed judgment, a statement of 6        grounds for the objection, and a financial statement. 7        If the defendant does not file an objection, the court 8        may enter the judgment for restitution without further 9        proceedings. If the defendant files an objection and 10        either party requests a hearing, the court shall 11        schedule a hearing. 12        (13) Access to presentence reports.13            (A) The victim may request a copy of the 14        presentence report prepared under the Unified Code of 15        Corrections from the State's Attorney. The State's 16        Attorney shall redact the following information before 17        providing a copy of the report:18                (i) the defendant's mental history and 19            condition;20                (ii) any evaluation prepared under subsection 21            (b) or (b-5) of Section 5-3-2; and22                (iii) the name, address, phone number, and 23            other personal information about any other victim.24            (B) The State's Attorney or the defendant may 25        request the court redact other information in the 26        report that may endanger the safety of any person.  SB0019- 27 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1            (C) The State's Attorney may orally disclose to 2        the victim any of the information that has been 3        redacted if there is a reasonable likelihood that the 4        information will be stated in court at the sentencing.5            (D) The State's Attorney must advise the victim 6        that the victim must maintain the confidentiality of 7        the report and other information. Any dissemination of 8        the report or information that was not stated at a 9        court proceeding constitutes indirect criminal 10        contempt of court. 11        (14) Appellate relief. If the trial court denies the 12    relief requested, the victim, the victim's attorney, or 13    the prosecuting attorney may file an appeal within 30 days 14    of the trial court's ruling. The trial or appellate court 15    may stay the court proceedings if the court finds that a 16    stay would not violate a constitutional right of the 17    defendant. If the appellate court denies the relief 18    sought, the reasons for the denial shall be clearly stated 19    in a written opinion. In any appeal in a criminal case, the 20    State may assert as error the court's denial of any crime 21    victim's right in the proceeding to which the appeal 22    relates.23        (15) Limitation on appellate relief. In no case shall 24    an appellate court provide a new trial to remedy the 25    violation of a victim's right. 26        (16) The right to be reasonably protected from the   SB0019- 28 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    accused throughout the criminal justice process and the 2    right to have the safety of the victim and the victim's 3    family considered in determining whether to release the 4    defendant, and setting conditions of release after arrest 5    and conviction. A victim of domestic violence, a sexual 6    offense, or stalking may request the entry of a protective 7    order under Article 112A of the Code of Criminal Procedure 8    of 1963. 9    (d) Procedures after the imposition of sentence.10        (1) The Prisoner Review Board shall inform a victim or 11    any other concerned citizen, upon written request, of the 12    prisoner's release on parole, mandatory supervised 13    release, electronic detention, work release, international 14    transfer or exchange, or by the custodian, other than the 15    Department of Juvenile Justice, of the discharge of any 16    individual who was adjudicated a delinquent for a crime 17    from State custody and by the sheriff of the appropriate 18    county of any such person's final discharge from county 19    custody. The Prisoner Review Board, upon written request, 20    shall provide to a victim or any other concerned citizen a 21    recent photograph of any person convicted of a felony, 22    upon his or her release from custody. The Prisoner Review 23    Board, upon written request, shall inform a victim or any 24    other concerned citizen when feasible at least 7 days 25    prior to the prisoner's release on furlough of the times 26    and dates of such furlough. Upon written request by the   SB0019- 29 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    victim or any other concerned citizen, the State's 2    Attorney shall notify the person once of the times and 3    dates of release of a prisoner sentenced to periodic 4    imprisonment. Notification shall be based on the most 5    recent information as to the victim's or other concerned 6    citizen's residence or other location available to the 7    notifying authority. 8        (2) When the defendant has been committed to the 9    Department of Human Services pursuant to Section 5-2-4 or 10    any other provision of the Unified Code of Corrections, 11    the victim may request to be notified by the releasing 12    authority of the approval by the court of an on-grounds 13    pass, a supervised off-grounds pass, an unsupervised 14    off-grounds pass, or conditional release; the release on 15    an off-grounds pass; the return from an off-grounds pass; 16    transfer to another facility; conditional release; escape; 17    death; or final discharge from State custody. The 18    Department of Human Services shall establish and maintain 19    a statewide telephone number to be used by victims to make 20    notification requests under these provisions and shall 21    publicize this telephone number on its website and to the 22    State's Attorney of each county.23        (3) In the event of an escape from State custody, the 24    Department of Corrections or the Department of Juvenile 25    Justice immediately shall notify the Prisoner Review Board 26    of the escape and the Prisoner Review Board shall notify   SB0019- 30 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    the victim. The notification shall be based upon the most 2    recent information as to the victim's residence or other 3    location available to the Board. When no such information 4    is available, the Board shall make all reasonable efforts 5    to obtain the information and make the notification. When 6    the escapee is apprehended, the Department of Corrections 7    or the Department of Juvenile Justice immediately shall 8    notify the Prisoner Review Board and the Board shall 9    notify the victim.10        (4) The victim of the crime for which the prisoner has 11    been sentenced has the right to register with the Prisoner 12    Review Board's victim registry. Victims registered with 13    the Board shall receive reasonable written notice not less 14    than 30 days prior to the parole hearing or target 15    aftercare release date. The victim has the right to submit 16    a victim statement for consideration by the Prisoner 17    Review Board or the Department of Juvenile Justice in 18    writing, on film, videotape, or other electronic means, or 19    in the form of a recording prior to the parole hearing or 20    target aftercare release date, or in person at the parole 21    hearing or aftercare release protest hearing, or by 22    calling the toll-free number established in subsection (f) 23    of this Section. The victim shall be notified within 7 24    days after the prisoner has been granted parole or 25    aftercare release and shall be informed of the right to 26    inspect the registry of parole decisions, established   SB0019- 31 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    under subsection (g) of Section 3-3-5 of the Unified Code 2    of Corrections. The provisions of this paragraph (4) are 3    subject to the Open Parole Hearings Act. Victim statements 4    provided to the Board shall be confidential and 5    privileged, including any statements received prior to 6    January 1, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act 7    101-288), except if the statement was an oral statement 8    made by the victim at a hearing open to the public.9        (4-1) The crime victim, including any person who has 10    had a final, plenary, or non-emergency protective order 11    granted against the petitioner or parole candidate under 12    Article 112A of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963, 13    the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986, the Stalking 14    No Contact Order Act, or the Civil No Contact Order Act, 15    has the right to submit a victim statement, in support or 16    opposition, for consideration by the Prisoner Review Board 17    or the Department of Juvenile Justice prior to or at a 18    hearing to determine the conditions of mandatory 19    supervised release of a person sentenced to a determinate 20    sentence or at a hearing on revocation of mandatory 21    supervised release of a person sentenced to a determinate 22    sentence. A victim statement may be submitted in writing, 23    on film, videotape, or other electronic means, or in the 24    form of a recording, or orally at a hearing, or by calling 25    the toll-free number established in subsection (f) of this 26    Section. Victim statements provided to the Board shall be   SB0019- 32 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    confidential and privileged, including any statements 2    received prior to January 1, 2020 (the effective date of 3    Public Act 101-288), except if the statement was an oral 4    statement made by the victim at a hearing open to the 5    public. 6        (4-2) The crime victim, including any person who has 7    had a final, plenary, or non-emergency protective order 8    granted against the petitioner or parole candidate under 9    Article 112A of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963, 10    the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986, the Stalking 11    No Contact Order Act, or the Civil No Contact Order Act, 12    has the right to submit a victim statement, in support or 13    opposition, to the Prisoner Review Board for consideration 14    at an executive clemency hearing as provided in Section 15    3-3-13 of the Unified Code of Corrections. A victim 16    statement may be submitted in writing, on film, videotape, 17    or other electronic means, or in the form of a recording 18    prior to a hearing, or orally at a hearing, or by calling 19    the toll-free number established in subsection (f) of this 20    Section. Victim statements provided to the Board shall be 21    confidential and privileged, including any statements 22    received prior to January 1, 2020 (the effective date of 23    Public Act 101-288), except if the statement was an oral 24    statement made by the victim at a hearing open to the 25    public. 26        (5) If a statement is presented under Section 6, the   SB0019- 33 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    Prisoner Review Board or Department of Juvenile Justice 2    shall inform the victim of any order of discharge pursuant 3    to Section 3-2.5-85 or 3-3-8 of the Unified Code of 4    Corrections.5        (6) At the written or oral request of the victim of the 6    crime for which the prisoner was sentenced or the State's 7    Attorney of the county where the person seeking parole or 8    aftercare release was prosecuted, the Prisoner Review 9    Board or Department of Juvenile Justice shall notify the 10    victim and the State's Attorney of the county where the 11    person seeking parole or aftercare release was prosecuted 12    of the death of the prisoner if the prisoner died while on 13    parole or aftercare release or mandatory supervised 14    release.15        (7) When a defendant who has been committed to the 16    Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile 17    Justice, or the Department of Human Services is released 18    or discharged and subsequently committed to the Department 19    of Human Services as a sexually violent person and the 20    victim had requested to be notified by the releasing 21    authority of the defendant's discharge, conditional 22    release, death, or escape from State custody, the 23    releasing authority shall provide to the Department of 24    Human Services such information that would allow the 25    Department of Human Services to contact the victim.26        (8) When a defendant has been convicted of a sex   SB0019- 34 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    offense as defined in Section 2 of the Sex Offender 2    Registration Act and has been sentenced to the Department 3    of Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice, the 4    Prisoner Review Board or the Department of Juvenile 5    Justice shall notify the victim of the sex offense of the 6    prisoner's eligibility for release on parole, aftercare 7    release, mandatory supervised release, electronic 8    detention, work release, international transfer or 9    exchange, or by the custodian of the discharge of any 10    individual who was adjudicated a delinquent for a sex 11    offense from State custody and by the sheriff of the 12    appropriate county of any such person's final discharge 13    from county custody. The notification shall be made to the 14    victim at least 30 days, whenever possible, before release 15    of the sex offender. 16    (e) The officials named in this Section may satisfy some 17or all of their obligations to provide notices and other 18information through participation in a statewide victim and 19witness notification system established by the Attorney 20General under Section 8.5 of this Act.21    (f) The Prisoner Review Board shall establish a toll-free 22number that may be accessed by the crime victim to present a 23victim statement to the Board in accordance with paragraphs 24(4), (4-1), and (4-2) of subsection (d).25    (g) The Prisoner Review Board shall publish on its 26official website, and provide to registered victims,   SB0019- 35 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1procedural information on how to submit victim statements. 2(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-288, eff. 1-1-20; 3101-652, eff. 1-1-23; 102-22, eff. 6-25-21; 102-558, eff. 48-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 5    (725 ILCS 120/5)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1405)6    Sec. 5. Rights of witnesses. 7    (a) Witnesses as defined in subsection (b) of Section 3 of 8this Act shall have the following rights:9        (1) to be notified by the Office of the State's 10    Attorney of all court proceedings at which the witness' 11    presence is required in a reasonable amount of time prior 12    to the proceeding, and to be notified of the cancellation 13    of any scheduled court proceeding in sufficient time to 14    prevent an unnecessary appearance in court, where 15    possible;16        (2) to be provided with appropriate employer 17    intercession services by the Office of the State's 18    Attorney or the victim advocate personnel to ensure that 19    employers of witnesses will cooperate with the criminal 20    justice system in order to minimize an employee's loss of 21    pay and other benefits resulting from court appearances;22        (3) to be provided, whenever possible, a secure 23    waiting area during court proceedings that does not 24    require witnesses to be in close proximity to defendants 25    and their families and friends;  SB0019- 36 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1        (4) to be provided with notice by the Office of the 2    State's Attorney, where necessary, of the right to have a 3    translator present whenever the witness' presence is 4    required and, in compliance with the federal Americans 5    with Disabilities Act of 1990, to be provided with notice 6    of the right to communications access through a sign 7    language interpreter or by other means.8    (b) At the written request of the witness, the witness 9shall:10        (1) receive notice from the office of the State's 11    Attorney of any request for post-conviction review filed 12    by the defendant under Article 122 of the Code of Criminal 13    Procedure of 1963, and of the date, time, and place of any 14    hearing concerning the petition for post-conviction 15    review; whenever possible, notice of the hearing on the 16    petition shall be given in advance;17        (2) receive notice by the releasing authority of the 18    defendant's discharge from State custody if the defendant 19    was committed to the Department of Human Services under 20    Section 5-2-4 or any other provision of the Unified Code 21    of Corrections;22        (3) receive notice from the Prisoner Review Board of 23    the prisoner's escape from State custody, after the Board 24    has been notified of the escape by the Department of 25    Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice; when 26    the escapee is apprehended, the Department of Corrections   SB0019- 37 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    or the Department of Juvenile Justice shall immediately 2    notify the Prisoner Review Board and the Board shall 3    notify the witness;4        (4) receive notice from the Prisoner Review Board or 5    the Department of Juvenile Justice of the prisoner's 6    release on parole, aftercare release, electronic 7    detention, work release or mandatory supervised release 8    and of the prisoner's final discharge from parole, 9    aftercare release, electronic detention, work release, or 10    mandatory supervised release.11    (c) The crime victim, including any person who has had a 12final, plenary, or non-emergency protective order granted 13against the petitioner or parole candidate under Article 112A 14of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963, the Illinois 15Domestic Violence Act of 1986, the Stalking No Contact Order 16Act, or the Civil No Contact Order Act, has the right to submit 17a victim statement, in support or opposition, to the Prisoner 18Review Board for consideration at a medical release hearing as 19provided in Section 3-3-14 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 20A victim statement may be submitted in writing, on film, 21videotape, or other electronic means, or in the form of a 22recording prior to a hearing, or orally at a hearing, or by 23calling the toll-free number established in subsection (f) of 24Section 4.5. Victim statements provided to the Board shall be 25confidential and privileged, including any statements received 26prior to the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd   SB0019- 38 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1General Assembly, except if the statement was an oral 2statement made by the victim at a hearing open to the public. 3(Source: P.A. 102-494, eff. 1-1-22.) 4    Section 10. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Sections 3-3-1, 3-3-2, 3-3-5, 3-3-8, 3-3-9, 3-3-13, 63-3-14, 3-5-1, 3-14-1, and 5-4.5-115 as follows: 7    (730 ILCS 5/3-3-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-3-1)8    Sec. 3-3-1. Establishment and appointment of Prisoner 9Review Board. 10    (a) There shall be a Prisoner Review Board independent of 11the Department which shall be:12        (1) the paroling authority for persons sentenced under 13    the law in effect prior to the effective date of this 14    amendatory Act of 1977;15        (1.2) the paroling authority for persons eligible for 16    parole review under Section 5-4.5-115; 17        (1.5) (blank); 18        (2) the board of review for cases involving the 19    revocation of sentence credits or a suspension or 20    reduction in the rate of accumulating the credit;21        (3) the board of review and recommendation for the 22    exercise of executive clemency by the Governor;23        (4) the authority for establishing release dates for 24    certain prisoners sentenced under the law in existence   SB0019- 39 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    prior to the effective date of this amendatory Act of 2    1977, in accordance with Section 3-3-2.1 of this Code;3        (5) the authority for setting conditions for parole 4    and mandatory supervised release under Section 5-8-1(a) of 5    this Code, and determining whether a violation of those 6    conditions warrant revocation of parole or mandatory 7    supervised release or the imposition of other sanctions;8        (6) the authority for determining whether a violation 9    of aftercare release conditions warrant revocation of 10    aftercare release; and 11        (7) the authority to release medically infirm or 12    disabled prisoners under Section 3-3-14. 13    (b) The Board shall consist of 15 persons appointed by the 14Governor by and with the advice and consent of the Senate. One 15member of the Board shall be designated by the Governor to be 16Chairman and shall serve as Chairman at the pleasure of the 17Governor. The members of the Board shall have had at least 5 18years of actual experience in the fields of penology, 19corrections work, advocacy for victims of crime and their 20families, advocacy for survivors of domestic violence, sexual 21violence, or intimate partner violence, law enforcement, 22sociology, law, education, social work, medicine, psychology, 23other behavioral sciences, or a combination thereof. At least 243 6 members so appointed must have at least 3 years experience 25in the field of juvenile matters. A total of 7 members must 26have at least 5 years' experience as a law enforcement   SB0019- 40 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1officer, parole officer, prosecutor, criminal defense 2attorney, or judge. No more than 8 Board members may be members 3of the same political party. 4    Each member of the Board shall serve on a full-time basis 5and shall not hold any other salaried public office, whether 6elective or appointive, nor any other office or position of 7profit, nor engage in any other business, employment, or 8vocation. The Chairman of the Board shall receive the same 9salary as the Chairperson of the Illinois Human Rights 10Commission $35,000 a year, or an amount set by the 11Compensation Review Board, whichever is greater, and each 12other member shall receive the same salary as members of the 13Illinois Human Rights Commission $30,000, or an amount set by 14the Compensation Review Board, whichever is greater. The 15changes made to the salary of the Chairman of the Board and to 16the salaries of other members of the Board by this amendatory 17Act of the 104th General Assembly apply only to persons who are 18appointed or reappointed to those positions on or after the 19effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 20Assembly. 21    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, 22the term of each member of the Board who was appointed by the 23Governor and is in office on June 30, 2003 shall terminate at 24the close of business on that date or when all of the successor 25members to be appointed pursuant to this amendatory Act of the 2693rd General Assembly have been appointed by the Governor,   SB0019- 41 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1whichever occurs later. As soon as possible, the Governor 2shall appoint persons to fill the vacancies created by this 3amendatory Act.4    Of the initial members appointed under this amendatory Act 5of the 93rd General Assembly, the Governor shall appoint 5 6members whose terms shall expire on the third Monday in 7January 2005, 5 members whose terms shall expire on the third 8Monday in January 2007, and 5 members whose terms shall expire 9on the third Monday in January 2009. Their respective 10successors shall be appointed for terms of 6 years from the 11third Monday in January of the year of appointment. Each 12member shall serve until his or her successor is appointed and 13qualified.14    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, any 15member appointed after January 1, 2026 shall be appointed for 16an 8-year term that begins upon the date of appointment or 17reappointment. Each member shall serve until the member's 18successor is appointed and qualified. 19    Any member may be removed by the Governor for 20incompetence, neglect of duty, malfeasance or inability to 21serve.22    (d) The Chairman of the Board shall be its chief executive 23and administrative officer. The Board may have an Executive 24Director; if so, the Executive Director shall be appointed by 25the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. The 26salary and duties of the Executive Director shall be fixed by   SB0019- 42 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1the Board.2    (e) Each member and commissioner of the Prisoner Review 3Board shall be required to complete a training course 4developed and administered in consultation with the Department 5of Corrections. The training shall be provided to new members 6and commissioners of the Prisoner Review Board within 30 days 7of the start of their service and before they take part in any 8hearings. The training shall cover topics, including, but not 9limited to: 10        (1) the prison and incarceration system, including a 11    tour of a correctional institution or facility and a 12    meeting with the facility administration; 13        (2) the nature and benefits of rehabilitative 14    corrections; 15        (3) rehabilitative programming provided by the 16    Department of Corrections available to incarcerated 17    individuals; and 18        (4) the impact of rehabilitative corrections and 19    programming on rates of recidivism. 20    In addition to the training course, each member and 21commissioner of the Board shall also be required to 22participate in 20 hours of continuing education or training 23per year. Training shall cover, but shall not be limited to, 24the following topics: domestic violence, restorative justice, 25racial bias, risk assessment bias, law enforcement bias, 26prevalence of wrongful conviction, prosecutorial misconduct,   SB0019- 43 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1police misconduct, mental health, cognitive behavioral 2therapy, trauma, the age-crime curve, recidivism, and the 3benefits of rehabilitative, educational, vocational, and 4health, programming in correctional facilities. Documentation 5of completion shall be submitted to and recorded by the 6Department of Corrections and made available to the public 7upon request. 8    The 20 hours of continuing education or training per year 9required in this subsection shall include a training course 10developed and administered by the entity administering the 11Illinois Domestic Violence Hotline. The training shall be 12provided to new members and commissioners of the Prisoner 13Review Board within 30 days of the start of their service and 14before they take part in any hearings. 15    This training shall be tailored specifically to the 16members of the Board and shall cover topics, including, but 17not limited to: 18        (1) the nature, extent, causes, and lethality of 19    domestic violence and gender-based violence; 20        (2) implicit and explicit biases toward parties 21    involved in domestic violence and gender-based violence; 22        (3) criminalization of survivors of domestic violence 23    and gender-based violence; 24        (4) behavioral patterns and relationship dynamics 25    within the cycle of violence; 26        (5) safety planning and procedures designed to promote   SB0019- 44 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    the safety of victims of domestic violence and 2    gender-based violence and their household members; 3        (6) resources available to victims of domestic 4    violence and gender-based violence and their household 5    members; and 6        (7) the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986, the 7    Stalking No Contact Order Act, the Civil No Contact Order 8    Act, and the legal process regarding protective orders. 9    (f) The Board may appoint commissioners to assist it in 10such manner as it directs and may discharge them at will. 11Commissioners shall not be subject to the Personnel Code. Any 12commissioner appointed shall be an attorney licensed to 13practice law in the State of Illinois. The Board in its 14discretion may assign any hearing to a commissioner, except 15that, in hearings requiring a quorum of the Board, only 16members shall participate, and in hearings requiring at least 173 members, at least 2 members shall participate. No 18commissioner may act as the lead member or point of contact for 19any institutional hearing. 20(Source: P.A. 101-288, eff. 1-1-20; 102-494, eff. 1-1-22.) 21    (730 ILCS 5/3-3-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-3-2)22    Sec. 3-3-2. Powers and duties. 23    (a) The Parole and Pardon Board is abolished and the term 24"Parole and Pardon Board" as used in any law of Illinois, shall 25read "Prisoner Review Board." After February 1, 1978 (the   SB0019- 45 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1effective date of Public Act 81-1099), the Prisoner Review 2Board shall provide by rule for the orderly transition of all 3files, records, and documents of the Parole and Pardon Board 4and for such other steps as may be necessary to effect an 5orderly transition and shall:6        (1) hear by at least one member and through a panel of 7    at least 3 members decide, cases of prisoners who were 8    sentenced under the law in effect prior to February 1, 9    1978 (the effective date of Public Act 81-1099), and who 10    are eligible for parole;11        (2) hear by at least one member and through a panel of 12    at least 3 members decide, the conditions of parole and 13    the time of discharge from parole, impose sanctions for 14    violations of parole, and revoke parole for those 15    sentenced under the law in effect prior to February 1, 16    1978 (the effective date of Public Act 81-1099); provided 17    that the decision to parole and the conditions of parole 18    for all prisoners who were sentenced for first degree 19    murder or who received a minimum sentence of 20 years or 20    more under the law in effect prior to February 1, 1978 21    shall be determined by a majority vote of the Prisoner 22    Review Board. One representative supporting parole and one 23    representative opposing parole will be allowed to speak. 24    Their comments shall be limited to making corrections and 25    filling in omissions to the Board's presentation and 26    discussion;  SB0019- 46 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1        (3) hear by at least one member and through a panel of 2    at least 3 members decide, the conditions of mandatory 3    supervised release and the time of discharge from 4    mandatory supervised release, impose sanctions for 5    violations of mandatory supervised release, and revoke 6    mandatory supervised release for those sentenced under the 7    law in effect after February 1, 1978 (the effective date 8    of Public Act 81-1099);9        (3.5) hear by at least one member and through a panel 10    of at least 3 members decide, the conditions of mandatory 11    supervised release and the time of discharge from 12    mandatory supervised release, to impose sanctions for 13    violations of mandatory supervised release and revoke 14    mandatory supervised release for those serving extended 15    supervised release terms pursuant to paragraph (4) of 16    subsection (d) of Section 5-8-1; 17        (3.6) hear by at least one member and through a panel 18    of at least 3 members decide whether to revoke aftercare 19    release for those committed to the Department of Juvenile 20    Justice under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987; 21        (4) hear by at least one member and through a panel of 22    at least 3 members, decide cases brought by the Department 23    of Corrections against a prisoner in the custody of the 24    Department for alleged violation of Department rules with 25    respect to sentence credits under Section 3-6-3 of this 26    Code in which the Department seeks to revoke sentence   SB0019- 47 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    credits, if the amount of time at issue exceeds 30 days or 2    when, during any 12-month period, the cumulative amount of 3    credit revoked exceeds 30 days except where the infraction 4    is committed or discovered within 60 days of scheduled 5    release. In such cases, the Department of Corrections may 6    revoke up to 30 days of sentence credit. The Board may 7    subsequently approve the revocation of additional sentence 8    credit, if the Department seeks to revoke sentence credit 9    in excess of 30 days. However, the Board shall not be 10    empowered to review the Department's decision with respect 11    to the loss of 30 days of sentence credit for any prisoner 12    or to increase any penalty beyond the length requested by 13    the Department;14        (5) hear by at least one member and through a panel of 15    at least 3 members decide, the release dates for certain 16    prisoners sentenced under the law in existence prior to 17    February 1, 1978 (the effective date of Public Act 18    81-1099), in accordance with Section 3-3-2.1 of this Code;19        (6) hear by at least one member and through a panel of 20    at least 3 members decide, all requests for pardon, 21    reprieve or commutation, and make confidential 22    recommendations to the Governor;23        (6.5) hear by at least one member who is qualified in 24    the field of juvenile matters and through a panel of at 25    least 3 members, 2 of whom are qualified in the field of 26    juvenile matters, decide parole review cases in accordance   SB0019- 48 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    with Section 5-4.5-115 of this Code and make release 2    determinations of persons under the age of 21 at the time 3    of the commission of an offense or offenses, other than 4    those persons serving sentences for first degree murder or 5    aggravated criminal sexual assault; 6        (6.6) hear by at least a quorum of the Prisoner Review 7    Board and decide by a majority of members present at the 8    hearing, in accordance with Section 5-4.5-115 of this 9    Code, release determinations of persons under the age of 10    21 at the time of the commission of an offense or offenses 11    of those persons serving sentences for first degree murder 12    or aggravated criminal sexual assault; 13        (7) comply with the requirements of the Open Parole 14    Hearings Act;15        (8) hear by at least one member and, through a panel of 16    at least 3 members, decide cases brought by the Department 17    of Corrections against a prisoner in the custody of the 18    Department for court dismissal of a frivolous lawsuit 19    pursuant to Section 3-6-3(d) of this Code in which the 20    Department seeks to revoke up to 180 days of sentence 21    credit, and if the prisoner has not accumulated 180 days 22    of sentence credit at the time of the dismissal, then all 23    sentence credit accumulated by the prisoner shall be 24    revoked;25        (9) hear by at least 3 members, and, through a panel of 26    at least 3 members, decide whether to grant certificates   SB0019- 49 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    of relief from disabilities or certificates of good 2    conduct as provided in Article 5.5 of Chapter V;3        (10) upon a petition by a person who has been 4    convicted of a Class 3 or Class 4 felony and who meets the 5    requirements of this paragraph, hear by at least 3 members 6    and, with the unanimous vote of a panel of 3 members, issue 7    a certificate of eligibility for sealing recommending that 8    the court order the sealing of all official records of the 9    arresting authority, the circuit court clerk, and the 10    Illinois State Police concerning the arrest and conviction 11    for the Class 3 or 4 felony. A person may not apply to the 12    Board for a certificate of eligibility for sealing:13            (A) until 5 years have elapsed since the 14        expiration of his or her sentence;15            (B) until 5 years have elapsed since any arrests 16        or detentions by a law enforcement officer for an 17        alleged violation of law, other than a petty offense, 18        traffic offense, conservation offense, or local 19        ordinance offense;20            (C) if convicted of a violation of the Cannabis 21        Control Act, Illinois Controlled Substances Act, the 22        Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 23        the Methamphetamine Precursor Control Act, or the 24        Methamphetamine Precursor Tracking Act unless the 25        petitioner has completed a drug abuse program for the 26        offense on which sealing is sought and provides proof   SB0019- 50 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1        that he or she has completed the program successfully;2            (D) if convicted of:3                (i) a sex offense described in Article 11 or 4            Sections 12-13, 12-14, 12-14.1, 12-15, or 12-16 of 5            the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 6            2012;7                (ii) aggravated assault;8                (iii) aggravated battery;9                (iv) domestic battery;10                (v) aggravated domestic battery;11                (vi) violation of an order of protection;12                (vii) an offense under the Criminal Code of 13            1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 involving a 14            firearm; 15                (viii) driving while under the influence of 16            alcohol, other drug or drugs, intoxicating 17            compound or compounds, or any combination thereof;18                (ix) aggravated driving while under the 19            influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, 20            intoxicating compound or compounds, or any 21            combination thereof; or22                (x) any crime defined as a crime of violence 23            under Section 2 of the Crime Victims Compensation 24            Act.25        If a person has applied to the Board for a certificate 26    of eligibility for sealing and the Board denies the   SB0019- 51 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    certificate, the person must wait at least 4 years before 2    filing again or filing for pardon from the Governor unless 3    the Chairman of the Prisoner Review Board grants a waiver.4        The decision to issue or refrain from issuing a 5    certificate of eligibility for sealing shall be at the 6    Board's sole discretion, and shall not give rise to any 7    cause of action against either the Board or its members.8        The Board may only authorize the sealing of Class 3 9    and 4 felony convictions of the petitioner from one 10    information or indictment under this paragraph (10). A 11    petitioner may only receive one certificate of eligibility 12    for sealing under this provision for life; and13        (11) upon a petition by a person who after having been 14    convicted of a Class 3 or Class 4 felony thereafter served 15    in the United States Armed Forces or National Guard of 16    this or any other state and had received an honorable 17    discharge from the United States Armed Forces or National 18    Guard or who at the time of filing the petition is enlisted 19    in the United States Armed Forces or National Guard of 20    this or any other state and served one tour of duty and who 21    meets the requirements of this paragraph, hear by at least 22    3 members and, with the unanimous vote of a panel of 3 23    members, issue a certificate of eligibility for 24    expungement recommending that the court order the 25    expungement of all official records of the arresting 26    authority, the circuit court clerk, and the Illinois State   SB0019- 52 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    Police concerning the arrest and conviction for the Class 2    3 or 4 felony. A person may not apply to the Board for a 3    certificate of eligibility for expungement:4            (A) if convicted of:5                (i) a sex offense described in Article 11 or 6            Sections 12-13, 12-14, 12-14.1, 12-15, or 12-16 of 7            the Criminal Code of 1961 or Criminal Code of 8            2012;9                (ii) an offense under the Criminal Code of 10            1961 or Criminal Code of 2012 involving a firearm; 11            or12                (iii) a crime of violence as defined in 13            Section 2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act; 14            or15            (B) if the person has not served in the United 16        States Armed Forces or National Guard of this or any 17        other state or has not received an honorable discharge 18        from the United States Armed Forces or National Guard 19        of this or any other state or who at the time of the 20        filing of the petition is serving in the United States 21        Armed Forces or National Guard of this or any other 22        state and has not completed one tour of duty.23        If a person has applied to the Board for a certificate 24    of eligibility for expungement and the Board denies the 25    certificate, the person must wait at least 4 years before 26    filing again or filing for a pardon with authorization for   SB0019- 53 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    expungement from the Governor unless the Governor or 2    Chairman of the Prisoner Review Board grants a waiver. 3    (a-5) The Prisoner Review Board, with the cooperation of 4and in coordination with the Department of Corrections and the 5Department of Central Management Services, shall provide 6implement a pilot project in 3 correctional institutions 7providing for the conduct of hearings under paragraphs (1) and 8(4) of subsection (a) of this Section through interactive 9video conferences. The The project shall be implemented within 106 months after January 1, 1997 (the effective date of Public 11Act 89-490). Within 6 months after the implementation of the 12pilot project, the Prisoner Review Board, with the cooperation 13of and in coordination with the Department of Corrections and 14the Department of Central Management Services, shall report 15annually to the Governor and the General Assembly regarding 16the use, costs, effectiveness, and future viability of 17interactive video conferences for Prisoner Review Board 18hearings.19    (b) Upon recommendation of the Department the Board may 20restore sentence credit previously revoked.21    (c) The Board shall cooperate with the Department in 22promoting an effective system of parole and mandatory 23supervised release.24    (d) The Board shall promulgate rules for the conduct of 25its work, and the Chairman shall file a copy of such rules and 26any amendments thereto with the Director and with the   SB0019- 54 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1Secretary of State.2    (e) The Board shall keep records of all of its official 3actions and shall make them accessible in accordance with law 4and the rules of the Board.5    (f) The Board or one who has allegedly violated the 6conditions of his or her parole, aftercare release, or 7mandatory supervised release may require by subpoena the 8attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of 9documentary evidence relating to any matter under 10investigation or hearing. The Chairman of the Board may sign 11subpoenas which shall be served by any agent or public 12official authorized by the Chairman of the Board, or by any 13person lawfully authorized to serve a subpoena under the laws 14of the State of Illinois. The attendance of witnesses, and the 15production of documentary evidence, may be required from any 16place in the State to a hearing location in the State before 17the Chairman of the Board or his or her designated agent or 18agents or any duly constituted Committee or Subcommittee of 19the Board. Witnesses so summoned shall be paid the same fees 20and mileage that are paid witnesses in the circuit courts of 21the State, and witnesses whose depositions are taken and the 22persons taking those depositions are each entitled to the same 23fees as are paid for like services in actions in the circuit 24courts of the State. Fees and mileage shall be vouchered for 25payment when the witness is discharged from further 26attendance.  SB0019- 55 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    In case of disobedience to a subpoena, the Board may 2petition any circuit court of the State for an order requiring 3the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of 4documentary evidence or both. A copy of such petition shall be 5served by personal service or by registered or certified mail 6upon the person who has failed to obey the subpoena, and such 7person shall be advised in writing that a hearing upon the 8petition will be requested in a court room to be designated in 9such notice before the judge hearing motions or extraordinary 10remedies at a specified time, on a specified date, not less 11than 10 nor more than 15 days after the deposit of the copy of 12the written notice and petition in the U.S. mail addressed to 13the person at his or her last known address or after the 14personal service of the copy of the notice and petition upon 15such person. The court upon the filing of such a petition, may 16order the person refusing to obey the subpoena to appear at an 17investigation or hearing, or to there produce documentary 18evidence, if so ordered, or to give evidence relative to the 19subject matter of that investigation or hearing. Any failure 20to obey such order of the circuit court may be punished by that 21court as a contempt of court.22    Each member of the Board and any hearing officer 23designated by the Board shall have the power to administer 24oaths and to take the testimony of persons under oath.25    (g) Except under subsection (a) of this Section, a 26majority of the members then appointed to the Prisoner Review   SB0019- 56 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1Board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all 2business of the Board.3    (h) The Prisoner Review Board shall annually transmit to 4the Director a detailed report of its work for the preceding 5calendar year, including votes cast by each member. The annual 6report shall also be transmitted to the Governor for 7submission to the Legislature.8(Source: P.A. 101-288, eff. 1-1-20; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 9102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 10    (730 ILCS 5/3-3-5)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-3-5)11    Sec. 3-3-5. Hearing and determination. 12    (a) The Prisoner Review Board shall meet as often as need 13requires to consider the cases of persons eligible for parole. 14Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) of subsection 15(a) of Section 3-3-2 of this Act, the Prisoner Review Board may 16meet and order its actions in panels of 3 or more members. The 17action of a majority of the panel shall be the action of the 18Board. 19    (b) If the person under consideration for parole is in the 20custody of the Department, at least one member of the Board 21shall interview him or her, and a report of that interview 22shall be available for the Board's consideration. However, in 23the discretion of the Board, the interview need not be 24conducted if a psychiatric examination determines that the 25person could not meaningfully contribute to the Board's   SB0019- 57 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1consideration. The Board may in its discretion parole a person 2who is then outside the jurisdiction on his or her record 3without an interview. The Board need not hold a hearing or 4interview a person who is paroled under paragraphs (d) or (e) 5of this Section or released on Mandatory release under Section 63-3-10.7    (c) (Blank). The Board shall not parole a person eligible 8for parole if it determines that:9        (1) there is a substantial risk that he or she will not 10    conform to reasonable conditions of parole or aftercare 11    release; or12        (2) his or her release at that time would deprecate 13    the seriousness of his or her offense or promote 14    disrespect for the law; or15        (3) his or her release would have a substantially 16    adverse effect on institutional discipline.17    (c-1) In deciding whether to grant or deny parole, the 18Board shall consider the following factors: 19        (1) participation in rehabilitative programming 20    available to the petitioner, including, but not limited 21    to, educational courses, vocational courses, life skills 22    courses, individual or group counseling courses, civics 23    education courses, peer education courses, independent 24    studies courses, substance abuse counseling courses, and 25    behavior modification courses; 26        (2) participation in professional licensing courses or   SB0019- 58 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    on-the-job training courses; 2        (3) letters from correctional staff, educational 3    faculty, community members, friends, and other 4    incarcerated persons; 5        (4) the petitioner's potential for rehabilitation or 6    the evidence of rehabilitation in the petitioner; 7        (5) the applicant's age at the time of the offense; 8        (6) the circumstances of the offense and the 9    petitioner's role and degree of participation in the 10    offense; 11        (7) the presence of a cognitive or developmental 12    disability in the petitioner at the time of the offense; 13        (8) the petitioner's family, home environment, and 14    educational and social background at the time of the 15    offense; 16        (9) evidence that the petitioner has suffered from 17    post-traumatic stress disorder, adverse childhood 18    experiences, or other traumas that could have been a 19    contributing factor to a person's criminal behavior and 20    participation in the offense; 21        (10) the presence or expression by the petitioner of 22    remorse, compassion, or insight of harm and collateral 23    effects experienced by the victims; 24        (11) the commission of a serious disciplinary 25    infraction within the previous 5 years; 26        (12) a pattern of fewer serious institutional   SB0019- 59 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    disciplinary infractions within the previous 2 years; 2        (13) evidence that the petitioner has any serious 3    medical conditions; 4        (14) evidence that the Department is unable to meet 5    the petitioner's medical needs; 6        (15) the petitioner's reentry plan, including, but not 7    limited to, residence plans, employment plans, continued 8    education plans, rehabilitation plans, and counseling 9    plans. 10    No one factor listed in this subsection (c-1) shall be 11dispositive. 12    (d) (Blank).13    (d-1) The Board shall, upon due notice, give a hearing to 14all petitioners for medical release and all candidates for 15parole, allowing representation by counsel, if desired, or the 16assistance of advocates and supporters, if desired. 17    (d-2) All petitioners for medical release and all 18candidates for parole appearing before the Prisoner Review 19Board shall be afforded the opportunity to appear in person or 20via interactive video teleconference. 21    (d-3) Clemency petitioners who are currently incarcerated 22and their legal counsel, if retained, shall be afforded the 23opportunity to a pre-hearing conference in person or via 24interactive video teleconference with at least one Board 25member. 26    (e) A person who has served the maximum term of   SB0019- 60 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1imprisonment imposed at the time of sentencing less time 2credit for good behavior shall be released on parole to serve a 3period of parole under Section 5-8-1.4    (f) The Board shall render its decision within a 5reasonable time after hearing and shall state the basis 6therefor both in the records of the Board and in written notice 7to the person on whose application it has acted. In its 8decision, the Board shall set the person's time for parole, or 9if it denies parole it shall provide for a rehearing not less 10frequently than once every year, except that the Board may, 11after denying parole, schedule a rehearing no later than 5 12years from the date of the parole denial, if the Board finds 13that it is not reasonable to expect that parole would be 14granted at a hearing prior to the scheduled rehearing date. If 15the Board shall parole a person, and, if he or she is not 16released within 90 days from the effective date of the order 17granting parole, the matter shall be returned to the Board for 18review. If the Board denies parole, the written notice must 19include an explanation of each factor the Board relied on in 20making its decision to deny parole and what factors and goals 21the applicant should focus on and try to meet to be granted 22parole at a subsequent hearing. 23    (f-1) If the Board paroles a person who is eligible for 24commitment as a sexually violent person, the effective date of 25the Board's order shall be stayed for 90 days for the purpose 26of evaluation and proceedings under the Sexually Violent   SB0019- 61 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1Persons Commitment Act. 2    (g) The Board shall maintain a registry of decisions in 3which parole has been granted, which shall include the name 4and case number of the prisoner, the highest charge for which 5the prisoner was sentenced, the length of sentence imposed, 6the date of the sentence, the date of the parole, and the basis 7for the decision of the Board to grant parole and the vote of 8the Board on any such decisions. The registry shall be made 9available for public inspection and copying during business 10hours and shall be a public record pursuant to the provisions 11of the Freedom of Information Act.12    (h) The Board shall promulgate rules regarding the 13exercise of its discretion under this Section.14(Source: P.A. 98-558, eff. 1-1-14; 99-268, eff. 1-1-16; 1599-628, eff. 1-1-17.) 16    (730 ILCS 5/3-3-8)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-3-8)17    Sec. 3-3-8. Length of parole and mandatory supervised 18release; discharge.19    (a) The length of parole for a person sentenced under the 20law in effect prior to the effective date of this amendatory 21Act of 1977 and the length of mandatory supervised release for 22those sentenced under the law in effect on and after such 23effective date shall be as set out in Section 5-8-1 unless 24sooner terminated under paragraph (b) of this Section.25    (b) The Prisoner Review Board may enter an order releasing   SB0019- 62 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1and discharging one from parole or mandatory supervised 2release, and his or her commitment to the Department, when it 3determines that he or she is likely to remain at liberty 4without committing another offense. Before entering such an 5order, the Prisoner Review Board shall provide notice and a 630-day opportunity to comment to any registered victim. 7    (b-1) Provided that the subject is in compliance with the 8terms and conditions of his or her parole or mandatory 9supervised release, the Prisoner Review Board shall reduce the 10period of a parolee or releasee's parole or mandatory 11supervised release by 90 days upon the parolee or releasee 12receiving a high school diploma, associate's degree, 13bachelor's degree, career certificate, or vocational technical 14certification or upon passage of high school equivalency 15testing during the period of his or her parole or mandatory 16supervised release. A parolee or releasee shall provide 17documentation from the educational institution or the source 18of the qualifying educational or vocational credential to 19their supervising officer for verification. Each reduction in 20the period of a subject's term of parole or mandatory 21supervised release shall be available only to subjects who 22have not previously earned the relevant credential for which 23they are receiving the reduction. As used in this Section, 24"career certificate" means a certificate awarded by an 25institution for satisfactory completion of a prescribed 26curriculum that is intended to prepare an individual for   SB0019- 63 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1employment in a specific field. 2    (b-2) The Prisoner Review Board may release a low-risk and 3need subject person from mandatory supervised release as 4determined by an appropriate evidence-based risk and need 5assessment. 6    (b-3) After the completion of at least 6 months for 7offenses set forth in paragraphs (1.5) through (7) of 8subsection (a) of Section 110-6.1 of the Code of Criminal 9Procedure of 1963 and 3 months for all other offenses, and upon 10completion of all mandatory conditions of parole or mandatory 11supervised release set forth in paragraph (7.5) of subsection 12(a) of Section 3-3-7 and subsection (b) of Section 3-3-7, the 13Department of Corrections shall complete a report describing 14whether the subject has completed the mandatory conditions of 15parole or mandatory supervised release. The report shall 16include whether the subject has complied with any mandatory 17conditions of parole or mandatory supervised release relating 18to orders of protection, civil no contact orders, or stalking 19no contact orders. The report shall also indicate whether a 20LEADS report reflects a conviction for a domestic violence 21offense within the prior 5 years. 22    (c) The order of discharge shall become effective upon 23entry of the order of the Board. The Board shall notify the 24clerk of the committing court of the order. Upon receipt of 25such copy, the clerk shall make an entry on the record judgment 26that the sentence or commitment has been satisfied pursuant to   SB0019- 64 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1the order.2    (d) Rights of the person discharged under this Section 3shall be restored under Section 5-5-5.4    (e) Upon a denial of early discharge under this Section, 5the Prisoner Review Board shall provide the person on parole 6or mandatory supervised release a list of steps or 7requirements that the person must complete or meet to be 8granted an early discharge at a subsequent review and share 9the process for seeking a subsequent early discharge review 10under this subsection. Upon the completion of such steps or 11requirements, the person on parole or mandatory supervised 12release may petition the Prisoner Review Board to grant them 13an early discharge review. Within no more than 30 days of a 14petition under this subsection, the Prisoner Review Board 15shall review the petition and make a determination. 16(Source: P.A. 103-271, eff. 1-1-24.) 17    (730 ILCS 5/3-3-9)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-3-9)18    Sec. 3-3-9. Violations; changes of conditions; preliminary 19hearing; revocation of parole or mandatory supervised release; 20revocation hearing.21    (a) If prior to expiration or termination of the term of 22parole or mandatory supervised release, a person violates a 23condition set by the Prisoner Review Board or a condition of 24parole or mandatory supervised release under Section 3-3-7 of 25this Code to govern that term, the Board may:  SB0019- 65 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1        (1) continue the existing term, with or without 2    modifying or enlarging the conditions; or3        (1.5) for those released as a result of youthful 4    offender parole as set forth in Section 5-4.5-115 of this 5    Code, order that the inmate be subsequently rereleased to 6    serve a specified mandatory supervised release term not to 7    exceed the full term permitted under the provisions of 8    Section 5-4.5-115 and subsection (d) of Section 5-8-1 of 9    this Code and may modify or enlarge the conditions of the 10    release as the Board deems proper; or 11        (2) parole or release the person to a half-way house; 12    or13        (3) revoke the parole or mandatory supervised release 14    and reconfine the person for a term computed in the 15    following manner:16            (i) (A) For those sentenced under the law in 17        effect prior to this amendatory Act of 1977, the 18        recommitment shall be for any portion of the imposed 19        maximum term of imprisonment or confinement which had 20        not been served at the time of parole and the parole 21        term, less the time elapsed between the parole of the 22        person and the commission of the violation for which 23        parole was revoked;24            (B) Except as set forth in paragraphs (C) and (D), 25        for those subject to mandatory supervised release 26        under paragraph (d) of Section 5-8-1 of this Code, the   SB0019- 66 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1        recommitment shall be for the total mandatory 2        supervised release term, less the time elapsed between 3        the release of the person and the commission of the 4        violation for which mandatory supervised release is 5        revoked. The Board may also order that a prisoner 6        serve up to one year of the sentence imposed by the 7        court which was not served due to the accumulation of 8        sentence credit;9            (C) For those subject to sex offender supervision 10        under clause (d)(4) of Section 5-8-1 of this Code, the 11        reconfinement period for violations of clauses (a)(3) 12        through (b-1)(15) of Section 3-3-7 shall not exceed 2 13        years from the date of reconfinement; 14            (D) For those released as a result of youthful 15        offender parole as set forth in Section 5-4.5-115 of 16        this Code, the reconfinement period shall be for the 17        total mandatory supervised release term, less the time 18        elapsed between the release of the person and the 19        commission of the violation for which mandatory 20        supervised release is revoked. The Board may also 21        order that a prisoner serve up to one year of the 22        mandatory supervised release term previously earned. 23        The Board may also order that the inmate be 24        subsequently rereleased to serve a specified mandatory 25        supervised release term not to exceed the full term 26        permitted under the provisions of Section 5-4.5-115   SB0019- 67 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1        and subsection (d) of Section 5-8-1 of this Code and 2        may modify or enlarge the conditions of the release as 3        the Board deems proper; 4             (ii) the person shall be given credit against the 5        term of reimprisonment or reconfinement for time spent 6        in custody since he or she was paroled or released 7        which has not been credited against another sentence 8        or period of confinement;9             (iii) (blank);10             (iv) this Section is subject to the release under 11        supervision and the reparole and rerelease provisions 12        of Section 3-3-10.13    (b) The Board may revoke parole or mandatory supervised 14release for violation of a condition for the duration of the 15term and for any further period which is reasonably necessary 16for the adjudication of matters arising before its expiration. 17The issuance of a warrant of arrest for an alleged violation of 18the conditions of parole or mandatory supervised release shall 19toll the running of the term until the final determination of 20the charge. When parole or mandatory supervised release is not 21revoked that period shall be credited to the term, unless a 22community-based sanction is imposed as an alternative to 23revocation and reincarceration, including a diversion 24established by the Illinois Department of Corrections Parole 25Services Unit prior to the holding of a preliminary parole 26revocation hearing. Parolees who are diverted to a   SB0019- 68 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1community-based sanction shall serve the entire term of parole 2or mandatory supervised release, if otherwise appropriate.3    (b-5) The Board shall revoke parole or mandatory 4supervised release for violation of the conditions prescribed 5in paragraph (7.6) of subsection (a) of Section 3-3-7.6    (c) A person charged with violating a condition of parole 7or mandatory supervised release shall have a preliminary 8hearing before a hearing officer designated by the Board to 9determine if there is cause to hold the person for a revocation 10hearing. However, no preliminary hearing need be held when 11revocation is based upon new criminal charges and a court 12finds probable cause on the new criminal charges or when the 13revocation is based upon a new criminal conviction and a 14certified copy of that conviction is available.15    (d) Parole or mandatory supervised release shall not be 16revoked without written notice to the offender setting forth 17the violation of parole or mandatory supervised release 18charged against him or her. Before the Board makes a decision 19on whether to revoke an offender's parole or mandatory 20supervised release, the Prisoner Review Board must run a LEADS 21report. The Board shall publish on the Board's publicly 22accessible website the name and identification number of 23offenders who are alleged to have violated terms of parole or 24mandatory supervised release and the Board's decision as to 25whether to revoke parole or mandatory supervised release. This 26information shall be accessible for a period of 60 days after   SB0019- 69 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1the information is posted. 2    (e) A hearing on revocation shall be conducted before at 3least one member of the Prisoner Review Board. The Board may 4meet and order its actions in panels of 3 or more members. The 5action of a majority of the panel shall be the action of the 6Board. A record of the hearing shall be made. At the hearing 7the offender shall be permitted to:8        (1) appear and answer the charge; and9        (2) bring witnesses on his or her behalf.10    (f) The Board shall either revoke parole or mandatory 11supervised release or order the person's term continued with 12or without modification or enlargement of the conditions.13    (g) Parole or mandatory supervised release shall not be 14revoked for failure to make payments under the conditions of 15parole or release unless the Board determines that such 16failure is due to the offender's willful refusal to pay.17(Source: P.A. 100-1182, eff. 6-1-19; 101-288, eff. 1-1-20.) 18    (730 ILCS 5/3-3-13)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-3-13)19    Sec. 3-3-13. Procedure for executive clemency. 20    (a) Petitions seeking pardon, commutation, or reprieve 21shall be addressed to the Governor and filed with the Prisoner 22Review Board. The petition shall be in writing and signed by 23the person under conviction or by a person on his behalf. It 24shall contain a brief history of the case, the reasons for 25seeking executive clemency, and other relevant information the   SB0019- 70 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1Board may require.2    (a-5) After a petition has been denied by the Governor, 3the Board may not accept a repeat petition for executive 4clemency for the same person until one full year has elapsed 5from the date of the denial. The Chairman of the Board may 6waive the one-year requirement if the petitioner offers in 7writing new information that was unavailable to the petitioner 8at the time of the filing of the prior petition and which the 9Chairman determines to be significant. The Chairman also may 10waive the one-year waiting period if the petitioner can show 11that a change in circumstances of a compelling humanitarian 12nature has arisen since the denial of the prior petition.13    (b) Notice of the proposed application shall be given by 14the Board to the committing court and the state's attorney of 15the county where the conviction was had.16    (b-5) Victims registered with the Board shall receive 17reasonable written notice not less than 30 days prior to the 18executive clemency hearing date. The victim has the right to 19submit a victim statement, in support or opposition, to the 20Prisoner Review Board for consideration at an executive 21clemency hearing as provided in subsection (c) of this 22Section. Victim statements provided to the Board shall be 23confidential and privileged, including any statements received 24prior to the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 101st 25General Assembly, except if the statement was an oral 26statement made by the victim at a hearing open to the public.   SB0019- 71 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    (c) The Board shall, upon due notice, give a hearing to 2each application, allowing representation by counsel, if 3desired, after which it shall confidentially advise the 4Governor by a written report of its recommendations which 5shall be determined by majority vote. The written report to 6the Governor shall be confidential and privileged, including 7any reports made prior to the effective date of this 8amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly. The Board shall 9meet to consider such petitions no less than 4 times each year.10    (d) The Governor shall decide each application and 11communicate his decision to the Board which shall notify the 12petitioner.13    In the event a petitioner who has been convicted of a Class 14X felony is granted a release, after the Governor has 15communicated such decision to the Board, the Board shall give 16written notice to the Sheriff of the county from which the 17offender was sentenced if such sheriff has requested that such 18notice be given on a continuing basis. In cases where arrest of 19the offender or the commission of the offense took place in any 20municipality with a population of more than 10,000 persons, 21the Board shall also give written notice to the proper law 22enforcement agency for said municipality which has requested 23notice on a continuing basis.24    (e) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit 25the power of the Governor under the constitution to grant a 26reprieve, commutation of sentence, or pardon.  SB0019- 72 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1(Source: P.A. 103-51, eff. 1-1-24.) 2    (730 ILCS 5/3-3-14)3    Sec. 3-3-14. Procedure for medical release.4    (a) Definitions.5        (1) As used in this Section, "medically incapacitated" 6    means that a petitioner an inmate has any diagnosable 7    medical condition, including dementia and severe, 8    permanent medical or cognitive disability, that prevents 9    the petitioner inmate from completing more than one 10    activity of daily living without assistance or that 11    incapacitates the petitioner inmate to the extent that 12    institutional confinement does not offer additional 13    restrictions, and that the condition is unlikely to 14    improve noticeably in the future.15        (2) As used in this Section, "terminal illness" means 16    a condition that satisfies all of the following criteria: 17            (i) the condition is irreversible and incurable; 18        and19            (ii) in accordance with medical standards and a 20        reasonable degree of medical certainty, based on an 21        individual assessment of the petitioner inmate, the 22        condition is likely to cause death to the petitioner 23        inmate within 18 months. 24    (b) The Prisoner Review Board shall consider an 25application for compassionate release on behalf of any   SB0019- 73 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1petitioner inmate who meets any of the following:2        (1) is suffering from a terminal illness; or3        (2) has been diagnosed with a condition that will 4    result in medical incapacity within the next 6 months; or5        (3) has become medically incapacitated subsequent to 6    sentencing due to illness or injury. 7    (c) Initial application. 8        (1) An initial application for medical release may be 9    filed with the Prisoner Review Board by the petitioner an 10    inmate, a prison official, a medical professional who has 11    treated or diagnosed the petitioner inmate, or the 12    petitioner's an inmate's spouse, parent, guardian, 13    grandparent, aunt or uncle, sibling, child over the age of 14    eighteen years, or attorney. If the initial application is 15    made by someone other than the petitioner inmate, the 16    petitioner inmate, or if the petitioner inmate is 17    medically unable to consent, the guardian or family member 18    designated to represent the petitioner's inmate's 19    interests must consent to the application at the time of 20    the institutional hearing.21        (2) Application materials shall be maintained on the 22    Prisoner Review Board's website and the Department of 23    Corrections' website and maintained in a clearly visible 24    place within the law library and the infirmary of every 25    penal institution and facility operated by the Department 26    of Corrections.   SB0019- 74 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1        (3) The initial application need not be notarized, can 2    be sent via email or facsimile, and must contain the 3    following information: 4            (i) the petitioner's inmate's name and Illinois 5        Department of Corrections number;6            (ii) the petitioner's inmate's diagnosis;7            (iii) a statement that the petitioner inmate meets 8        one of the following diagnostic criteria: 9                (A) the petitioner inmate is suffering from a 10            terminal illness;11                (B) the petitioner inmate has been diagnosed 12            with a condition that will result in medical 13            incapacity within the next 6 months; or14                (C) the petitioner inmate has become medically 15            incapacitated subsequent to sentencing due to 16            illness or injury. 17        (3.5) The Prisoner Review Board shall place no 18    additional restrictions, limitations, or requirements on 19    applications from petitioners. 20        (4) Upon receiving the petitioner's inmate's initial 21    application, the Board shall order the Department of 22    Corrections to have a physician or nurse practitioner 23    evaluate the petitioner inmate and create a written 24    evaluation within ten days of the Board's order. The 25    evaluation shall include but need not be limited to: 26            (i) a concise statement of the petitioner inmate's   SB0019- 75 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1        medical diagnosis, including prognosis, likelihood of 2        recovery, and primary symptoms, to include 3        incapacitation; and4            (ii) a statement confirming or denying that the 5        petitioner inmate meets one of the criteria stated in 6        subsection (b) of this Section. 7        (5) Upon a determination that the petitioner is 8    eligible for a hearing, the Prisoner Review Board shall:9            (i) provide public notice of the petitioner's 10        name, docket number, counsel, and hearing date; and11            (ii) provide a copy of the evaluation and any 12        medical records provided by the Department of 13        Corrections to the petitioner or the petitioner's 14        attorney upon scheduling the institutional hearing.15    (d) Institutional hearing. No public institutional hearing 16is required for consideration of a petition, but shall be 17granted at the request of the petitioner. Hearings are public 18unless the petitioner requests a non-public hearing. The 19petitioner has a right to attend the hearing and to speak on 20the petitioner's own behalf. The petitioner inmate may be 21represented by counsel and may present witnesses to the Board 22members. Hearings shall be governed by the Open Parole 23Hearings Act. Members of the public shall be permitted to 24freely attend public hearings without restriction. 25    (e) Voting procedure. Petitions shall be considered by 26three-member panels, and decisions shall be made by simple   SB0019- 76 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1majority. Voting shall take place during the public hearing. 2    (f) Consideration. In considering a petition for release 3under the statute, the Prisoner Review Board may consider the 4following factors: 5            (i) the petitioner's inmate's diagnosis and 6        likelihood of recovery;7            (ii) the approximate cost of health care to the 8        State should the petitioner inmate remain in custody;9            (iii) the impact that the petitioner's inmate's 10        continued incarceration may have on the provision of 11        medical care within the Department;12            (iv) the present likelihood of and ability to pose 13        a substantial danger to the physical safety of a 14        specifically identifiable person or persons;15            (v) any statements by the victim regarding 16        release; and17            (vi) whether the petitioner's inmate's condition 18        was explicitly disclosed to the original sentencing 19        judge and taken into account at the time of 20        sentencing. 21    (f-1) Upon denying an eligible petitioner's application 22for medical release, the Prisoner Review Board shall publish a 23decision letter outlining the reason for denial. The decision 24letter must include an explanation of each statutory factor 25and the estimated annual cost of the petitioner's continued 26incarceration, including the petitioner's medical care.   SB0019- 77 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    (g) Petitioners Inmates granted medical release shall be 2released on mandatory supervised release for a period of 5 3years subject to Section 3-3-8, which shall operate to 4discharge any remaining term of years imposed upon him or her. 5However, in no event shall the eligible person serve a period 6of mandatory supervised release greater than the aggregate of 7the discharged underlying sentence and the mandatory 8supervised release period as set forth in Section 5-4.5-20.9    (h) Within 90 days of the receipt of the initial 10application, the Prisoner Review Board shall conduct a hearing 11if a hearing is requested and render a decision granting or 12denying the petitioner's request for release.13    (i) Nothing in this statute shall preclude a petitioner 14from seeking alternative forms of release, including clemency, 15relief from the sentencing court, post-conviction relief, or 16any other legal remedy.17    (j) This act applies retroactively, and shall be 18applicable to all currently incarcerated people in Illinois.19    (k) Data report. The Department of Corrections and the 20Prisoner Review Board shall release a report annually 21published on their websites that reports the following 22information about the Medical Release Program:23        (1) The number of applications for medical release 24    received by the Board in the preceding year, and 25    information about those applications, including: 26            (i) demographic data about the petitioner   SB0019- 78 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1        individual, including race or ethnicity, gender, age, 2        and institution;3            (ii) the highest class of offense for which the 4        petitioner individual is incarcerated;5            (iii) the relationship of the petitioner applicant 6        to the person completing the application;7            (iv) whether the petitioner applicant had applied 8        for medical release before and been denied, and, if 9        so, when;10            (v) whether the petitioner person applied as a 11        person who is medically incapacitated or a person who 12        is terminally ill; and13            (vi) a basic description of the underlying medical 14        condition that led to the application ; and . 15            (vii) the institution in which the petitioner was 16        confined at the time of the application. 17        (2) The number of medical statements from the 18    Department of Corrections received by the Board.19        (3) The number of institutional hearings on medical 20    release applications conducted by the Board including: .21            (i) whether the petitioner was represented by an 22        attorney; and23            (ii) whether the application was considered in a 24        public or non-public hearing.25        (4) The number of people approved for medical release, 26    and information about them, including:   SB0019- 79 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1            (i) demographic data about the individual 2        including race or ethnicity, gender, age, and zip code 3        to which they were released;4            (ii) whether the person applied as a person who is 5        medically incapacitated or a person who is terminally 6        ill;7            (iii) a basic description of the underlying 8        medical condition that led to the application; and9            (iv) a basic description of the medical setting 10        the person was released to; . 11            (v) whether the petitioner was represented by an 12        attorney; and13            (vi) whether the application was considered in a 14        public or non-public hearing. 15        (5) The number of people released on the medical 16    release program.17        (6) The number of people approved for medical release 18    who experienced more than a one-month delay between 19    release decision and ultimate release, including: 20            (i) demographic data about the individuals 21        including race or ethnicity, gender and age;22            (ii) the reason for the delay;23            (iii) whether the person remains incarcerated; and24            (iv) a basic description of the underlying medical 25        condition of the applying person. 26        (7) For those individuals released on mandatory   SB0019- 80 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    supervised release due to a granted application for 2    medical release: 3            (i) the number of individuals who were serving 4        terms of mandatory supervised release because of 5        medical release applications during the previous year; 6            (ii) the number of individuals who had their 7        mandatory supervised release revoked; and8            (iii) the number of individuals who died during 9        the previous year. 10        (8) Information on seriously ill individuals 11    incarcerated at the Department of Corrections, including: 12            (i) the number of people currently receiving 13        full-time one-on-one medical care or assistance with 14        activities of daily living within Department of 15        Corrections facilities and whether that care is 16        provided by a medical practitioner or an incarcerated 17        person inmate, along with the institutions at which 18        they are incarcerated; and19            (ii) the number of people who spent more than one 20        month in outside hospital care during the previous 21        year and their home institutions. 22    All the information provided in this report shall be 23provided in aggregate, and nothing shall be construed to 24require the public dissemination of any personal medical 25information. 26(Source: P.A. 102-494, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.)   SB0019- 81 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    (730 ILCS 5/3-5-1)2    Sec. 3-5-1. Master record file. 3    (a) The Department of Corrections and the Department of 4Juvenile Justice shall maintain a master record file on each 5person committed to it, which shall contain the following 6information:7        (1) all information from the committing court;8        (1.5) ethnic and racial background data collected in 9    accordance with Section 4.5 of the Criminal Identification 10    Act and Section 2-5 of the No Representation Without 11    Population Act; 12        (1.6) the committed person's last known complete 13    street address prior to incarceration or legal residence 14    collected in accordance with Section 2-5 of the No 15    Representation Without Population Act; 16        (2) reception summary;17        (3) evaluation and assignment reports and 18    recommendations;19        (4) reports as to program assignment and progress;20        (5) reports of disciplinary infractions and 21    disposition, including tickets and Administrative Review 22    Board action;23        (6) any parole or aftercare release plan;24        (7) any parole or aftercare release reports;25        (8) the date and circumstances of final discharge;   SB0019- 82 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1        (9) criminal history;2        (10) current and past gang affiliations and ranks;3        (11) information regarding associations and family 4    relationships;5        (12) any grievances filed and responses to those 6    grievances;7        (13) other information that the respective Department 8    determines is relevant to the secure confinement and 9    rehabilitation of the committed person;10        (14) the last known address provided by the person 11    committed; and 12        (15) all medical and dental records. 13    (b) Except as provided in subsections (f) and (f-5), all 14All files shall be confidential and access shall be limited to 15authorized personnel of the respective Department or by 16disclosure in accordance with a court order or subpoena. 17Personnel of other correctional, welfare or law enforcement 18agencies may have access to files under rules and regulations 19of the respective Department. The respective Department shall 20keep a record of all outside personnel who have access to 21files, the files reviewed, any file material copied, and the 22purpose of access. If the respective Department or the 23Prisoner Review Board makes a determination under this Code 24which affects the length of the period of confinement or 25commitment, the committed person and his counsel shall be 26advised of factual information relied upon by the respective   SB0019- 83 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1Department or Board to make the determination, provided that 2the Department or Board shall not be required to advise a 3person committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice any 4such information which in the opinion of the Department of 5Juvenile Justice or Board would be detrimental to his 6treatment or rehabilitation.7    (c) The master file shall be maintained at a place 8convenient to its use by personnel of the respective 9Department in charge of the person. When custody of a person is 10transferred from the Department to another department or 11agency, a summary of the file shall be forwarded to the 12receiving agency with such other information required by law 13or requested by the agency under rules and regulations of the 14respective Department.15    (d) The master file of a person no longer in the custody of 16the respective Department shall be placed on inactive status 17and its use shall be restricted subject to rules and 18regulations of the Department.19    (e) All public agencies may make available to the 20respective Department on request any factual data not 21otherwise privileged as a matter of law in their possession in 22respect to individuals committed to the respective Department.23    (f) A committed person may request a summary of the 24committed person's master record file once per year and the 25committed person's attorney may request one summary of the 26committed person's master record file once per year. The   SB0019- 84 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1Department shall create a form for requesting this summary, 2and shall make that form available to committed persons and to 3the public on its website. Upon receipt of the request form, 4the Department shall provide the summary within 15 days. The 5summary must contain, unless otherwise prohibited by law:6        (1) the person's name, ethnic, racial, last known 7    street address prior to incarceration or legal residence, 8    and other identifying information;9        (2) all digitally available information from the 10    committing court;11        (3) all information in the Offender 360 system on the 12    person's criminal history;13        (4) the person's complete assignment history in the 14    Department of Corrections;15        (5) the person's disciplinary card;16        (6) additional records about up to 3 specific 17    disciplinary incidents as identified by the requester;18        (7) any available records about up to 5 specific 19    grievances filed by the person, as identified by the 20    requester; and21        (8) the records of all grievances filed on or after 22    January 1, 2023.23    Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection (f) to 24the contrary, a committed person's master record file is not 25subject to disclosure and copying under the Freedom of 26Information Act.   SB0019- 85 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    (f-5) At least 60 days before a person's executive 2clemency, medical release, or parole hearing, if requested, 3the Department of Corrections shall provide the person and 4their legal counsel, if retained, a copy of (i) the person's 5disciplinary card and (ii) any available records of the 6person's participation in programming and education. 7    (g) Subject to appropriation, on or before July 1, 2025, 8the Department of Corrections shall digitalize all newly 9committed persons' master record files who become incarcerated 10and all other new information that the Department maintains 11concerning its correctional institutions, facilities, and 12individuals incarcerated.13    (h) Subject to appropriation, on or before July 1, 2027, 14the Department of Corrections shall digitalize all medical and 15dental records in the master record files and all other 16information that the Department maintains concerning its 17correctional institutions and facilities in relation to 18medical records, dental records, and medical and dental needs 19of committed persons.20    (i) Subject to appropriation, on or before July 1, 2029, 21the Department of Corrections shall digitalize all information 22in the master record files and all other information that the 23Department maintains concerning its correctional institutions 24and facilities.25    (j) The Department of Corrections shall adopt rules to 26implement subsections (g), (h), and (i) if appropriations are   SB0019- 86 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1available to implement these provisions.2    (k) Subject to appropriation, the Department of 3Corrections, in consultation with the Department of Innovation 4and Technology, shall conduct a study on the best way to 5digitize all Department of Corrections records and the impact 6of that digitizing on State agencies, including the impact on 7the Department of Innovation and Technology. The study shall 8be completed on or before January 1, 2024. 9(Source: P.A. 102-776, eff. 1-1-23; 102-784, eff. 5-13-22; 10103-18, eff. 1-1-24; 103-71, eff. 6-9-23; 103-154, eff. 116-30-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 12    (730 ILCS 5/3-14-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-14-1)13    Sec. 3-14-1. Release from the institution. 14    (a) Upon release of a person on parole, mandatory release, 15final discharge, or pardon, the Department shall return all 16property held for him, provide him with suitable clothing and 17procure necessary transportation for him to his designated 18place of residence and employment. It may provide such person 19with a grant of money for travel and expenses which may be paid 20in installments. The amount of the money grant shall be 21determined by the Department.22    (a-1) The Department shall, before a wrongfully imprisoned 23person, as defined in Section 3-1-2 of this Code, is 24discharged from the Department, provide him or her with any 25documents necessary after discharge.   SB0019- 87 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    (a-2) The Department of Corrections may establish and 2maintain, in any institution it administers, revolving funds 3to be known as "Travel and Allowances Revolving Funds". These 4revolving funds shall be used for advancing travel and expense 5allowances to committed, paroled, and discharged prisoners. 6The moneys paid into such revolving funds shall be from 7appropriations to the Department for Committed, Paroled, and 8Discharged Prisoners.9    (a-3) Upon release of a person who is eligible to vote on 10parole, mandatory release, final discharge, or pardon, the 11Department shall provide the person with a form that informs 12him or her that his or her voting rights have been restored and 13a voter registration application. The Department shall have 14available voter registration applications in the languages 15provided by the Illinois State Board of Elections. The form 16that informs the person that his or her rights have been 17restored shall include the following information:18        (1) All voting rights are restored upon release from 19    the Department's custody.20        (2) A person who is eligible to vote must register in 21    order to be able to vote. 22    The Department of Corrections shall confirm that the 23person received the voter registration application and has 24been informed that his or her voting rights have been 25restored. 26    (a-4) Prior to release of a person on parole, mandatory   SB0019- 88 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1supervised release, final discharge, or pardon, the Department 2shall screen every person for Medicaid eligibility. Officials 3of the correctional institution or facility where the 4committed person is assigned shall assist an eligible person 5to complete a Medicaid application to ensure that the person 6begins receiving benefits as soon as possible after his or her 7release. The application must include the eligible person's 8address associated with his or her residence upon release from 9the facility. If the residence is temporary, the eligible 10person must notify the Department of Human Services of his or 11her change in address upon transition to permanent housing. 12    (a-5) Upon release of a person from its custody to parole, 13upon mandatory supervised release, or upon final discharge, 14the Department shall run a LEADS report and shall notify the 15person of all in-effect orders of protection issued against 16the person under Article 112A of the Code of Criminal 17Procedure of 1963 or under the Illinois Domestic Violence Act 18of 1986 that are identified in the LEADS report. 19    (b) (Blank).20    (c) Except as otherwise provided in this Code, the 21Department shall establish procedures to provide written 22notification of any release of any person who has been 23convicted of a felony to the State's Attorney and sheriff of 24the county from which the offender was committed, and the 25State's Attorney and sheriff of the county into which the 26offender is to be paroled or released. Except as otherwise   SB0019- 89 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1provided in this Code, the Department shall establish 2procedures to provide written notification to the proper law 3enforcement agency for any municipality of any release of any 4person who has been convicted of a felony if the arrest of the 5offender or the commission of the offense took place in the 6municipality, if the offender is to be paroled or released 7into the municipality, or if the offender resided in the 8municipality at the time of the commission of the offense. If a 9person convicted of a felony who is in the custody of the 10Department of Corrections or on parole or mandatory supervised 11release informs the Department that he or she has resided, 12resides, or will reside at an address that is a housing 13facility owned, managed, operated, or leased by a public 14housing agency, the Department must send written notification 15of that information to the public housing agency that owns, 16manages, operates, or leases the housing facility. The written 17notification shall, when possible, be given at least 14 days 18before release of the person from custody, or as soon 19thereafter as possible. The written notification shall be 20provided electronically if the State's Attorney, sheriff, 21proper law enforcement agency, or public housing agency has 22provided the Department with an accurate and up to date email 23address. 24    (c-1) (Blank).25    (c-2) The Department shall establish procedures to provide 26notice to the Illinois State Police of the release or   SB0019- 90 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1discharge of persons convicted of violations of the 2Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act or a 3violation of the Methamphetamine Precursor Control Act. The 4Illinois State Police shall make this information available to 5local, State, or federal law enforcement agencies upon 6request.7    (c-5) If a person on parole or mandatory supervised 8release becomes a resident of a facility licensed or regulated 9by the Department of Public Health, the Illinois Department of 10Public Aid, or the Illinois Department of Human Services, the 11Department of Corrections shall provide copies of the 12following information to the appropriate licensing or 13regulating Department and the licensed or regulated facility 14where the person becomes a resident:15        (1) The mittimus and any pre-sentence investigation 16    reports.17        (2) The social evaluation prepared pursuant to Section 18    3-8-2.19        (3) Any pre-release evaluation conducted pursuant to 20    subsection (j) of Section 3-6-2.21        (4) Reports of disciplinary infractions and 22    dispositions.23        (5) Any parole plan, including orders issued by the 24    Prisoner Review Board, and any violation reports and 25    dispositions.26        (6) The name and contact information for the assigned   SB0019- 91 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    parole agent and parole supervisor. 2    This information shall be provided within 3 days of the 3person becoming a resident of the facility. 4    (c-10) If a person on parole or mandatory supervised 5release becomes a resident of a facility licensed or regulated 6by the Department of Public Health, the Illinois Department of 7Public Aid, or the Illinois Department of Human Services, the 8Department of Corrections shall provide written notification 9of such residence to the following:10        (1) The Prisoner Review Board.11        (2) The chief of police and sheriff in the 12    municipality and county in which the licensed facility is 13    located.14    The notification shall be provided within 3 days of the 15person becoming a resident of the facility. 16    (d) Upon the release of a committed person on parole, 17mandatory supervised release, final discharge, or pardon, the 18Department shall provide such person with information 19concerning programs and services of the Illinois Department of 20Public Health to ascertain whether such person has been 21exposed to the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) or any 22identified causative agent of Acquired Immunodeficiency 23Syndrome (AIDS).24    (e) Upon the release of a committed person on parole, 25mandatory supervised release, final discharge, pardon, or who 26has been wrongfully imprisoned, the Department shall verify   SB0019- 92 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1the released person's full name, date of birth, and social 2security number. If verification is made by the Department by 3obtaining a certified copy of the released person's birth 4certificate and the released person's social security card or 5other documents authorized by the Secretary, the Department 6shall provide the birth certificate and social security card 7or other documents authorized by the Secretary to the released 8person. If verification by the Department is done by means 9other than obtaining a certified copy of the released person's 10birth certificate and the released person's social security 11card or other documents authorized by the Secretary, the 12Department shall complete a verification form, prescribed by 13the Secretary of State, and shall provide that verification 14form to the released person.15    (f) Forty-five days prior to the scheduled discharge of a 16person committed to the custody of the Department of 17Corrections, the Department shall give the person:18        (1) who is otherwise uninsured an opportunity to apply 19    for health care coverage including medical assistance 20    under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code in 21    accordance with subsection (b) of Section 1-8.5 of the 22    Illinois Public Aid Code, and the Department of 23    Corrections shall provide assistance with completion of 24    the application for health care coverage including medical 25    assistance;26        (2) information about obtaining a standard Illinois   SB0019- 93 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    Identification Card or a limited-term Illinois 2    Identification Card under Section 4 of the Illinois 3    Identification Card Act if the person has not been issued 4    an Illinois Identification Card under subsection (a-20) of 5    Section 4 of the Illinois Identification Card Act;6        (3) information about voter registration and may 7    distribute information prepared by the State Board of 8    Elections. The Department of Corrections may enter into an 9    interagency contract with the State Board of Elections to 10    participate in the automatic voter registration program 11    and be a designated automatic voter registration agency 12    under Section 1A-16.2 of the Election Code;13        (4) information about job listings upon discharge from 14    the correctional institution or facility;15        (5) information about available housing upon discharge 16    from the correctional institution or facility;17        (6) a directory of elected State officials and of 18    officials elected in the county and municipality, if any, 19    in which the committed person intends to reside upon 20    discharge from the correctional institution or facility; 21    and22        (7) any other information that the Department of 23    Corrections deems necessary to provide the committed 24    person in order for the committed person to reenter the 25    community and avoid recidivism. 26    (g) Sixty days before the scheduled discharge of a person   SB0019- 94 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1committed to the custody of the Department or upon receipt of 2the person's certified birth certificate and social security 3card as set forth in subsection (d) of Section 3-8-1 of this 4Act, whichever occurs later, the Department shall transmit an 5application for an Identification Card to the Secretary of 6State, in accordance with subsection (a-20) of Section 4 of 7the Illinois Identification Card Act.8    The Department may adopt rules to implement this Section. 9(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 10102-606, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-345, eff. 111-1-24.) 12    (730 ILCS 5/5-4.5-115)13    Sec. 5-4.5-115. Parole review of persons under the age of 1421 at the time of the commission of an offense.15    (a) For purposes of this Section, "victim" means a victim 16of a violent crime as defined in subsection (a) of Section 3 of 17the Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act including a 18witness as defined in subsection (b) of Section 3 of the Rights 19of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act; any person legally related 20to the victim by blood, marriage, adoption, or guardianship; 21any friend of the victim; or any concerned citizen.22    (b) A person under 21 years of age at the time of the 23commission of an offense or offenses, other than first degree 24murder, and who is not serving a sentence for first degree 25murder and who is sentenced on or after June 1, 2019 (the   SB0019- 95 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1effective date of Public Act 100-1182) shall be eligible for 2parole review by the Prisoner Review Board after serving 10 3years or more of his or her sentence or sentences, except for 4those serving a sentence or sentences for: (1) aggravated 5criminal sexual assault who shall be eligible for parole 6review by the Prisoner Review Board after serving 20 years or 7more of his or her sentence or sentences or (2) predatory 8criminal sexual assault of a child who shall not be eligible 9for parole review by the Prisoner Review Board under this 10Section. A person under 21 years of age at the time of the 11commission of first degree murder who is sentenced on or after 12June 1, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 100-1182) shall 13be eligible for parole review by the Prisoner Review Board 14after serving 20 years or more of his or her sentence or 15sentences, except for those subject to a term of natural life 16imprisonment under Section 5-8-1 of this Code or any person 17subject to sentencing under subsection (c) of Section 185-4.5-105 of this Code, who shall be eligible for parole 19review by the Prisoner Review Board after serving 40 years or 20more of his or her sentence or sentences.21    (c) Three years prior to becoming eligible for parole 22review, the eligible person may file his or her petition for 23parole review with the Prisoner Review Board. The petition 24shall include a copy of the order of commitment and sentence to 25the Department of Corrections for the offense or offenses for 26which review is sought. Within 30 days of receipt of this   SB0019- 96 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1petition, the Prisoner Review Board shall determine whether 2the petition is appropriately filed, and if so, shall set a 3date for parole review 3 years from receipt of the petition and 4notify the Department of Corrections within 10 business days. 5If the Prisoner Review Board determines that the petition is 6not appropriately filed, it shall notify the petitioner in 7writing, including a basis for its determination.8    (d) Within 6 months of the Prisoner Review Board's 9determination that the petition was appropriately filed, a 10representative from the Department of Corrections shall meet 11with the eligible person and provide the inmate information 12about the parole hearing process and personalized 13recommendations for the inmate regarding his or her work 14assignments, rehabilitative programs, and institutional 15behavior. Following this meeting, the eligible person has 7 16calendar days to file a written request to the representative 17from the Department of Corrections who met with the eligible 18person of any additional programs and services which the 19eligible person believes should be made available to prepare 20the eligible person for return to the community. 21    (e) One year prior to the person being eligible for 22parole, counsel shall be appointed by the Prisoner Review 23Board upon a finding of indigency. The eligible person may 24waive appointed counsel or retain his or her own counsel at his 25or her own expense.26    (f) Nine months prior to the hearing, the Prisoner Review   SB0019- 97 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1Board shall provide the eligible person, and his or her 2counsel, any written documents or materials it will be 3considering in making its decision unless the written 4documents or materials are specifically found to: (1) include 5information which, if disclosed, would damage the therapeutic 6relationship between the inmate and a mental health 7professional; (2) subject any person to the actual risk of 8physical harm; (3) threaten the safety or security of the 9Department or an institution. In accordance with Section 104.5(d)(4) of the Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act and 11Section 10 of the Open Parole Hearings Act, victim statements 12provided to the Board shall be confidential and privileged, 13including any statements received prior to the effective date 14of this amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly, except 15if the statement was an oral statement made by the victim at a 16hearing open to the public. Victim statements shall not be 17considered public documents under the provisions of the 18Freedom of Information Act. The inmate or his or her attorney 19shall not be given a copy of the statement, but shall be 20informed of the existence of a victim statement and the 21position taken by the victim on the inmate's request for 22parole. This shall not be construed to permit disclosure to an 23inmate of any information which might result in the risk of 24threats or physical harm to a victim. The Prisoner Review 25Board shall have an ongoing duty to provide the eligible 26person, and his or her counsel, with any further documents or   SB0019- 98 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1materials that come into its possession prior to the hearing 2subject to the limitations contained in this subsection.3    (g) Not less than 12 months prior to the hearing, the 4Prisoner Review Board shall provide notification to the 5State's Attorney of the county from which the person was 6committed and written notification to the victim or family of 7the victim of the scheduled hearing place, date, and 8approximate time. The written notification shall contain: (1) 9information about their right to be present, appear in person 10at the parole hearing, and their right to make an oral 11statement and submit information in writing, by videotape, 12tape recording, or other electronic means; (2) a toll-free 13number to call for further information about the parole review 14process; and (3) information regarding available resources, 15including trauma-informed therapy, they may access. If the 16Board does not have knowledge of the current address of the 17victim or family of the victim, it shall notify the State's 18Attorney of the county of commitment and request assistance in 19locating the victim or family of the victim. Those victims or 20family of the victims who advise the Board in writing that they 21no longer wish to be notified shall not receive future 22notices. A victim shall have the right to submit information 23by videotape, tape recording, or other electronic means. The 24victim may submit this material prior to or at the parole 25hearing. The victim also has the right to be heard at the 26parole hearing.  SB0019- 99 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1    (h) The hearing conducted by the Prisoner Review Board 2shall be governed by Sections 15 and 20, subsection (f) of 3Section 5, subsections (a), (a-5), (b), (b-5), and (c) of 4Section 10, and subsection (d) of Section 25 of the Open Parole 5Hearings Act and Part 1610 of Title 20 of the Illinois 6Administrative Code. The eligible person has a right to be 7present at the Prisoner Review Board hearing, unless the 8Prisoner Review Board determines the eligible person's 9presence is unduly burdensome when conducting a hearing under 10paragraph (6.6) of subsection (a) of Section 3-3-2 of this 11Code. If a psychological evaluation is submitted for the 12Prisoner Review Board's consideration, it shall be prepared by 13a person who has expertise in adolescent brain development and 14behavior, and shall take into consideration the diminished 15culpability of youthful offenders, the hallmark features of 16youth, and any subsequent growth and increased maturity of the 17person. At the hearing, the eligible person shall have the 18right to make a statement on his or her own behalf.19    (i) Only upon motion for good cause shall the date for the 20Prisoner Review Board hearing, as set by subsection (b) of 21this Section, be changed. No less than 15 days prior to the 22hearing, the Prisoner Review Board shall notify the victim or 23victim representative, the attorney, and the eligible person 24of the exact date and time of the hearing. All hearings shall 25be open to the public.26    (j) (Blank). The Prisoner Review Board shall not parole   SB0019- 100 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1the eligible person if it determines that:2        (1) there is a substantial risk that the eligible 3    person will not conform to reasonable conditions of parole 4    or aftercare release; or5        (2) the eligible person's release at that time would 6    deprecate the seriousness of his or her offense or promote 7    disrespect for the law; or8        (3) the eligible person's release would have a 9    substantially adverse effect on institutional discipline.10    In considering the factors affecting the release 11determination under 20 Ill. Adm. Code 1610.50(b), the Prisoner 12Review Board panel shall consider the diminished culpability 13of youthful offenders, the hallmark features of youth, and any 14subsequent growth and maturity of the youthful offender during 15incarceration. 16    (j-5) In deciding whether to grant or deny parole, the 17Board shall consider the following factors: 18        (1) participation in rehabilitative programming 19    available to the petitioner, including, but not limited 20    to, educational courses, vocational courses, life skills 21    courses, individual or group counseling courses, civics 22    education courses, peer education courses, independent 23    studies courses, substance abuse counseling courses, and 24    behavior modification courses; 25        (2) participation in professional licensing courses or 26    on-the-job training courses;   SB0019- 101 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1        (3) letters from correctional staff, educational 2    faculty, community members, friends, and other 3    incarcerated persons; 4        (4) the petitioner's potential for rehabilitation or 5    the evidence of rehabilitation in the petitioner; 6        (5) the applicant's age at the time of the offense; 7        (6) the circumstances of the offense and the 8    petitioner's role and degree of participation in the 9    offense; 10        (7) the presence of a cognitive or developmental 11    disability in the petitioner at the time of the offense; 12        (8) the petitioner's family, home environment, 13    educational and social background at the time of the 14    offense; 15        (9) evidence that the petitioner has suffered from 16    post-traumatic stress disorder, adverse childhood 17    experiences, or other traumas that could have been a 18    contributing factor to a person's criminal behavior and 19    participation in the offense; 20        (10) the presence or expression by the petitioner of 21    remorse, compassion, or insight of harm and collateral 22    effects experienced by the victims; 23        (11) the commission of a serious disciplinary 24    infraction within the previous 5 years; 25        (12) a pattern of fewer serious institutional 26    disciplinary infractions within the previous 2 years;   SB0019- 102 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1        (13) evidence that the petitioner has any serious 2    medical conditions; 3        (14) evidence that the Department is unable to meet 4    the petitioner's medical needs; 5        (15) the petitioner's reentry plan, including, but not 6    limited to, residence plans, employment plans, continued 7    education plans, rehabilitation plans, and counseling 8    plans. 9    No one factor in this subsection (j-5) shall be 10dispositive. In considering the factors affecting the release 11determination under 20 Ill. Adm. Code 1610.50(b), the Prisoner 12Review Board panel shall consider the diminished culpability 13of youthful offenders, the hallmark features of youth, and any 14subsequent growth and maturity of the youthful offender during 15incarceration. 16    (k) Unless denied parole under subsection (j) of this 17Section and subject to the provisions of Section 3-3-9 of this 18Code: (1) the eligible person serving a sentence for any 19non-first degree murder offense or offenses, shall be released 20on parole which shall operate to discharge any remaining term 21of years sentence imposed upon him or her, notwithstanding any 22required mandatory supervised release period the eligible 23person is required to serve; and (2) the eligible person 24serving a sentence for any first degree murder offense, shall 25be released on mandatory supervised release for a period of 10 26years subject to Section 3-3-8, which shall operate to   SB0019- 103 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1discharge any remaining term of years sentence imposed upon 2him or her, however in no event shall the eligible person serve 3a period of mandatory supervised release greater than the 4aggregate of the discharged underlying sentence and the 5mandatory supervised release period as sent forth in Section 65-4.5-20.7    (l) If the Prisoner Review Board denies parole after 8conducting the hearing under subsection (j) of this Section, 9it shall issue a written decision which states the rationale 10for denial, including the primary factors considered. This 11decision shall be provided to the eligible person and his or 12her counsel within 30 days.13    (m) A person denied parole under subsection (j) of this 14Section, who is not serving a sentence for either first degree 15murder or aggravated criminal sexual assault, shall be 16eligible for a second parole review by the Prisoner Review 17Board 5 years after the written decision under subsection (l) 18of this Section; a person denied parole under subsection (j) 19of this Section, who is serving a sentence or sentences for 20first degree murder or aggravated criminal sexual assault 21shall be eligible for a second and final parole review by the 22Prisoner Review Board 10 years after the written decision 23under subsection (k) of this Section. The procedures for a 24second parole review shall be governed by subsections (c) 25through (k) of this Section.26    (n) A person denied parole under subsection (m) of this   SB0019- 104 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1Section, who is not serving a sentence for either first degree 2murder or aggravated criminal sexual assault, shall be 3eligible for a third and final parole review by the Prisoner 4Review Board 5 years after the written decision under 5subsection (l) of this Section. The procedures for the third 6and final parole review shall be governed by subsections (c) 7through (k) of this Section. 8    (o) Notwithstanding anything else to the contrary in this 9Section, nothing in this Section shall be construed to delay 10parole or mandatory supervised release consideration for 11petitioners who are or will be eligible for release earlier 12than this Section provides. Nothing in this Section shall be 13construed as a limit, substitution, or bar on a person's right 14to sentencing relief, or any other manner of relief, obtained 15by order of a court in proceedings other than as provided in 16this Section.17(Source: P.A. 101-288, eff. 1-1-20; 102-1128, eff. 1-1-24.) 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.  SB0019- 105 -LRB104 08032 JDS 18078 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    40 ILCS 5/18-127from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 18-1274    725 ILCS 120/4.55    725 ILCS 120/5from Ch. 38, par. 14056    730 ILCS 5/3-3-1from Ch. 38, par. 1003-3-17    730 ILCS 5/3-3-2from Ch. 38, par. 1003-3-28    730 ILCS 5/3-3-5from Ch. 38, par. 1003-3-59    730 ILCS 5/3-3-8from Ch. 38, par. 1003-3-810    730 ILCS 5/3-3-9from Ch. 38, par. 1003-3-911    730 ILCS 5/3-3-13from Ch. 38, par. 1003-3-1312    730 ILCS 5/3-3-1413    730 ILCS 5/3-5-114    730 ILCS 5/3-14-1from Ch. 38, par. 1003-14-115    730 ILCS 5/5-4.5-115